N () the fourteenth letter of English alphabet, is a vocal consonent, and, in allusion to its mode of formation, is called the dentinasal or linguanasal consonent. Its commoner sound is that heard in ran, done; but when immediately followed in the same word by the sound of g hard or k (as in single, sink, conquer), it usually represents the same sound as the digraph ng in sing, bring, etc. This is a simple but related sound, and is called the gutturo-nasal consonent. See Guide to Pronunciation, // 243-246.

N (n.) A measure of space equal to half an M (or em); an en.

Na (a. & adv.) No, not. See No.

Nab (n.) The summit of an eminence.

Nab (n.) The cock of a gunlock.

Nab (n.) The keeper, or box into which the lock is shot.

Nabbed (imp. & p. p.) of Nab

Nabbing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Nab

Nab (v. t.) To catch or seize suddenly or unexpectedly.

Nabit (n.) Pulverized sugar candy.

Nabk (n.) The edible berries of the Zizyphys Lotus, a tree of Northern Africa, and Southwestern Europe.

Nabob (n.) A deputy or viceroy in India; a governor of a province of the ancient Mogul empire.

Nabob (n.) One who returns to Europe from the East with immense riches: hence, any man of great wealth.

Nacarat (n.) A pale red color, with a cast of orange.

Nacarat (n.) Fine linen or crape dyed of this color.

Nacker (n.) See Nacre.

Nacre (n.) A pearly substance which lines the interior of many shells, and is most perfect in the mother-of-pearl. [Written also nacker and naker.] See Pearl, and Mother-of-pearl.

Nacreous (a.) Consisting of, or resembling, nacre; pearly.

Nad () Alt. of Nadde

Nadde () Had not.

Nadder (n.) An adder.

Nadir (n.) That point of the heavens, or lower hemisphere, directly opposite the zenith; the inferior pole of the horizon; the point of the celestial sphere directly under the place where we stand.

Nadir (n.) The lowest point; the time of greatest depression.

Naenia (n.) See Nenia.

Naeve (n.) A naevus.

Naevoid (a.) Resembling a naevus or naevi; as, naevoid elephantiasis.

Naevose (a.) Spotted; frecled.

Naevi (pl. ) of Navus

Navus (n.) A spot or mark on the skin of children when born; a birthmark; -- usually applied to vascular tumors, i. e., those consisting mainly of blood vessels, as dilated arteries, veins, or capillaries.

Nag (n.) A small horse; a pony; hence, any horse.

Nag (n.) A paramour; -- in contempt.

Nagged (imp. & p. p.) of Nag

Nagging (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Nag

Nag (v. t. & i.) To tease in a petty way; to scold habitually; to annoy; to fret pertinaciously.

Nagging (a.) Fault-finding; teasing; persistently annoying; as, a nagging toothache.

Naggy (a.) Irritable; touchy.

Nagor (n.) A West African gazelle (Gazella redunca).

Nagyagite (n.) A mineral of blackish lead-gray color and metallic luster, generally of a foliated massive structure; foliated tellurium. It is a telluride of lead and gold.

Naiad (n.) A water nymph; one of the lower female divinities, fabled to preside over some body of fresh water, as a lake, river, brook, or fountain.

Naiad (n.) Any species of a tribe (Naiades) of freshwater bivalves, including Unio, Anodonta, and numerous allied genera; a river mussel.

Naiad (n.) One of a group of butterflies. See Nymph.

Naiad (n.) Any plant of the order Naiadaceae, such as eelgrass, pondweed, etc.

Naiant (a.) See Natant.

Naid (n.) Any one of numerous species of small, fresh-water, chaetopod annelids of the tribe Naidina. They belong to the Oligochaeta.

Naif (a.) Having a true natural luster without being cut; -- applied by jewelers to a precious stone.

Naif (a.) Naive; as, a naif remark.

Naik (n.) A chief; a leader; a Sepoy corporal.

Nail (n.) the horny scale of plate of epidermis at the end of the fingers and toes of man and many apes.

Nail (n.) The basal thickened portion of the anterior wings of certain hemiptera.

Nail (n.) The terminal horny plate on the beak of ducks, and other allied birds.

Nail (n.) A slender, pointed piece of metal, usually with a head, used for fastening pieces of wood or other material together, by being driven into or through them.

Nail (a.) A measure of length, being two inches and a quarter, or the sixteenth of a yard.

Nailed (imp. & p. p.) of Nail

Nailing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Nail

Nail (n.) To fasten with a nail or nails; to close up or secure by means of nails; as, to nail boards to the beams.

Nail (n.) To stud or boss with nails, or as with nails.

Nail (n.) To fasten, as with a nail; to bind or hold, as to a bargain or to acquiescence in an argument or assertion; hence, to catch; to trap.

Nail (n.) To spike, as a cannon.

Nailbrush (n.) A brush for cleaning the nails.

Nailer (n.) One whose occupation is to make nails; a nail maker.

Nailer (n.) One who fastens with, or drives, nails.

Naileress (n.) A women who makes nailes.

Naileries (pl. ) of Nailery

Nailery () A manufactory where nails are made.

Nail-headed (a.) Having a head like that of a nail; formed so as to resemble the head of a nail.

Nailless (a.) Without nails; having no nails.

Nainsook (n.) A thick sort of jaconet muslin, plain or striped, formerly made in India.

Nais (n.) See Naiad.

Naissant (a.) Same as Jessant.

Naive (a.) Having native or unaffected simplicity; ingenuous; artless; frank; as, naive manners; a naive person; naive and unsophisticated remarks.

Naively (adv.) In a naive manner.

Naivete (n.) Native simplicity; unaffected plainness or ingenuousness; artlessness.

Naivety (n.) Naivete.

Nake (v.t.) To make naked.

Naked (a.) Having no clothes on; uncovered; nude; bare; as, a naked body; a naked limb; a naked sword.

Naked (a.) Having no means of defense or protection; open; unarmed; defenseless.

Naked (a.) Unprovided with needful or desirable accessories, means of sustenance, etc.; destitute; unaided; bare.

Naked (a.) Without addition, exaggeration, or excuses; not concealed or disguised; open to view; manifest; plain.

Naked (a.) Mere; simple; plain.

Naked (a.) Without pubescence; as, a naked leaf or stem; bare, or not covered by the customary parts, as a flower without a perianth, a stem without leaves, seeds without a pericarp, buds without bud scales.

Naked (a.) Not having the full complement of tones; -- said of a chord of only two tones, which requires a third tone to be sounded with them to make the combination pleasing to the ear; as, a naked fourth or fifth.

Nakedly (adv.) In a naked manner; without covering or disguise; manifestly; simply; barely.

Nakedness (n.) The condition of being naked.

Nakedness (n.) The privy parts; the genitals.

Naker (n.) Same as Nacre.

Naker (n.) A kind of kettledrum.

Nakoo (n.) The gavial.

Nale (n.) Ale; also, an alehouse.

Nall (n.) An awl.

Nam () Am not.

Nam () imp. of Nim.

Namable (a.) Capable of being named.

Namation (n.) A distraining or levying of a distress; an impounding.

Namaycush (n.) A large North American lake trout (Salvelinus namaycush). It is usually spotted with red, and sometimes weighs over forty pounds. Called also Mackinaw trout, lake trout, lake salmon, salmon trout, togue, and tuladi.

Namby-pamby (n.) Talk or writing which is weakly sentimental or affectedly pretty.

Namby-pamby (a.) Affectedly pretty; weakly sentimental; finical; insipid.

Name (n.) The title by which any person or thing is known or designated; a distinctive specific appellation, whether of an individual or a class.

Name (n.) A descriptive or qualifying appellation given to a person or thing, on account of a character or acts.

Name (n.) Reputed character; reputation, good or bad; estimation; fame; especially, illustrious character or fame; honorable estimation; distinction.

Name (n.) Those of a certain name; a race; a family.

Name (n.) A person, an individual.

Named (imp. & p. p.) of Name

Naming (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Name

Name (n.) To give a distinctive name or appellation to; to entitle; to denominate; to style; to call.

Name (n.) To mention by name; to utter or publish the name of; to refer to by distinctive title; to mention.

Name (n.) To designate by name or specifically for any purpose; to nominate; to specify; to appoint; as, to name a day for the wedding.

Name (n.) To designate (a member) by name, as the Speaker does by way of reprimand.

Nameless (a.) Without a name; not having been given a name; as, a nameless star.

Nameless (a.) Undistinguished; not noted or famous.

Nameless (a.) Not known or mentioned by name; anonymous; as, a nameless writer.

Nameless (a.) Unnamable; indescribable; inexpressible.

Namelessly (adv.) In a nameless manner.

Namely (adv.) By name; by particular mention; specifically; especially; expressly.

Namely (adv.) That is to say; to wit; videlicet; -- introducing a particular or specific designation.

Namer (n.) One who names, or calls by name.

Namesake (n.) One that has the same name as another; especially, one called after, or named out of regard to, another.

Namo (adv.) No more.

Nan (inerj.) Anan.

Nandine (n.) An African carnivore (Nandinia binotata), allied to the civets. It is spotted with black.

Nandou (n.) Alt. of Nandu

Nandu (n.) Any one of three species of South American ostriches of the genera Rhea and Pterocnemia. See Rhea.

Nankeen (n.) A species of cloth, of a firm texture, originally brought from China, made of a species of cotton (Gossypium religiosum) that is naturally of a brownish yellow color quite indestructible and permanent.

Nankeen (n.) An imitation of this cloth by artificial coloring.

Nankeen (n.) Trousers made of nankeen.

Nanny (n.) A diminutive of Ann or Anne, the proper name.

Nannyberry (n.) See Sheepberry.

Nanpie (n.) The magpie.

Naos (n.) A term used by modern archaeologists instead of cella. See Cella.

Napped (imp. & p. p.) of Nap

Napping (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Nap

Nap (v. i.) To have a short sleep; to be drowsy; to doze.

Nap (v. i.) To be in a careless, secure state.

Nap (n.) A short sleep; a doze; a siesta.

Nap (n.) Woolly or villous surface of felt, cloth, plants, etc.; an external covering of down, of short fine hairs or fibers forming part of the substance of anything, and lying smoothly in one direction; the pile; -- as, the nap of cotton flannel or of broadcloth.

Nap (n.) The loops which are cut to make the pile, in velvet.

Nap (v. t.) To raise, or put, a nap on.

Nape (n.) The back part of the neck.

Nape-crest (n.) An African bird of the genus Schizorhis, related to the plantain eaters.

Naperies (pl. ) of Napery

Napery (n.) Table linen; also, linen clothing, or linen in general.

Napha water () A perfume distilled from orange flowers.

Naphew (n.) See Navew.

Naphtha (n.) The complex mixture of volatile, liquid, inflammable hydrocarbons, occurring naturally, and usually called crude petroleum, mineral oil, or rock oil. Specifically: That portion of the distillate obtained in the refinement of petroleum which is intermediate between the lighter gasoline and the heavier benzine, and has a specific gravity of about 0.7, -- used as a solvent for varnishes, as a carburetant, illuminant, etc.

Naphtha (n.) One of several volatile inflammable liquids obtained by the distillation of certain carbonaceous materials and resembling the naphtha from petroleum; as, Boghead naphtha, from Boghead coal (obtained at Boghead, Scotland); crude naphtha, or light oil, from coal tar; wood naphtha, from wood, etc.

Naphthalate (n.) A salt of naphthalic acid; a phthalate.

Naphthalene (n.) A white crystalline aromatic hydrocarbon, C10H8, analogous to benzene, and obtained by the distillation of certain bituminous materials, such as the heavy oil of coal tar. It is the type and basis of a large number of derivatives among organic compounds. Formerly called also naphthaline.

Naphthalenic (a.) Pertaining to , or derived from, naphthalene; -- used specifically to designate a yellow crystalline substance, called naphthalenic acid and also hydroxy quinone, and obtained from certain derivatives of naphthol.

Naphthalic (a.) Pertaining to, derived from, or related to, naphthalene; -- used specifically to denote any one of a series of acids derived from naphthalene, and called naphthalene acids.

Naphthalic (a.) Formerly, designating an acid probably identical with phthalic acid.

Naphthalidine (n.) Same as Naphthylamine.

Naphthalin (n.) Alt. of Naphthaline

Naphthaline (n.) See Naphthalene.

Naphthalize (v. t.) To mingle, saturate, or impregnate, with naphtha.

Naphthazarin (n.) A dyestuff, resembling alizarin, obtained from naphthoquinone as a red crystalline substance with a bright green, metallic luster; -- called also naphthalizarin.

Naphthene (n.) A peculiar hydrocarbon occuring as an ingredient of Caucasian petroleum.

Naphthide (n.) A compound of naphthalene or its radical with a metallic element; as, mercuric naphthide.

Naphthoic (a.) Pertaining to, derived from, or related to, naphthalene; -- used specifically to designate any one of a series of carboxyl derivatives, called naphthoic acids.

Naphthol (n.) Any one of a series of hydroxyl derivatives of naphthalene, analogous to phenol. In general they are crystalline substances with a phenol (carbolic) odor.

Naphthoquinone (n.) A yellow crystalline substance, C10H6O2, analogous to quinone, obtained by oxidizing naphthalene with chromic acid.

Naphthyl (n.) A hydrocarbon radical regarded as the essential residue of naphthalene.

Naphthylamine (n.) One of two basic amido derivatives of naphthalene, C10H7.NH2, forming crystalline solids.

Napierian (a.) Alt. of Naperian

Naperian (a.) Of, pertaining to, or discovered by, Napier, or Naper.

Napier's bones () Alt. of Napier's rods

Napier's rods () A set of rods, made of bone or other material, each divided into nine spaces, and containing the numbers of a column of the multiplication table; -- a contrivance of Baron Napier, the inventor of logarithms, for facilitating the operations of multiplication and division.

Napiform (a.) Turnip-shaped; large and round in the upper part, and very slender below.

Napkin (n.) A little towel, or small cloth, esp. one for wiping the fingers and mouth at table.

Napkin (n.) A handkerchief.

Napless (a.) Without nap; threadbare.

Naples yellow () See under Yellow.

Napoleon (n.) A French gold coin of twenty francs, or about $3.86.

Napoleonic (a.) Of or pertaining to Napoleon I., or his family; resembling, or having the qualities of, Napoleon I.

Napoleonist (n.) A supporter of the dynasty of the Napoleons.

Nappe (n.) Sheet; surface; all that portion of a surface that is continuous in such a way that it is possible to pass from any one point of the portion to any other point of the portion without leaving the surface. Thus, some hyperboloids have one nappe, and some have two.

Nappiness (n.) The quality of having a nap; abundance of nap, as on cloth.

Napping (n.) The act or process of raising a nap, as on cloth.

Napping (n.) A sheet of partially felted fur before it is united to the hat body.

Nappy (a.) Inclined to sleep; sleepy; as, to feel nappy.

Nappy (a.) Tending to cause sleepiness; serving to make sleepy; strong; heady; as, nappy ale.

Nappy (a.) Having a nap or pile; downy; shaggy.

Nappies (pl. ) of Nappy

Nappy (n.) A round earthen dish, with a flat bottom and sloping sides.

Nap-taking (n.) A taking by surprise; an unexpected onset or attack.

Napu (n.) A very small chevrotain (Tragulus Javanicus), native of Java. It is about the size of a hare, and is noted for its agility in leaping. Called also Java musk deer, pygmy musk deer, and deerlet.

Napus (n.) A kind of turnip. See Navew.

Narceine (n.) An alkaloid found in small quantities in opium, and extracted as a white crystalline substance of a bitter astringent taste. It is a narcotic. Called also narceia.

Narcissine (a.) Of or pertaining to Narcissus.

Narcissuses (pl. ) of Narcissus

Narcissus (n.) A genus of endogenous bulbous plants with handsome flowers, having a cup-shaped crown within the six-lobed perianth, and comprising the daffodils and jonquils of several kinds.

Narcissus (n.) A beautiful youth fabled to have been enamored of his own image as seen in a fountain, and to have been changed into the flower called Narcissus.

Narcosis (n.) Privation of sense or consciousness, due to a narcotic.

Narcotic (a.) Having the properties of a narcotic; operating as a narcotic.

Narcotic (n.) A drug which, in medicinal doses, generally allays morbid susceptibility, relieves pain, and produces sleep; but which, in poisonous doses, produces stupor, coma, or convulsions, and, when given in sufficient quantity, causes death. The best examples are opium (with morphine), belladonna (with atropine), and conium.

Narcotical (a.) Narcotic.

Narcotine (n.) An alkaloid found in opium, and extracted as a white crystalline substance, tasteless and less poisonous than morphine; -- called also narcotia.

Narcotinic (a.) Pertaining to narcotine.

Narcotism (n.) Narcosis; the state of being narcotized.

Narcotized (imp. & p. p.) of Narcotize

Narcotizing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Narcotize

Narcotize (v. t.) To imbue with, or subject to the influence of, a narcotic; to put into a state of narcosis.

Nard (n.) An East Indian plant (Nardostachys Jatamansi) of the Valerian family, used from remote ages in Oriental perfumery.

Nard (n.) An ointment prepared partly from this plant. See Spikenard.

Nard (n.) A kind of grass (Nardus stricta) of little value, found in Europe and Asia.

Nardine (a.) Of or pertaining to nard; having the qualities of nard.

Nardoo (n.) An Australian name for Marsilea Drummondii, a four-leaved cryptogamous plant, sometimes used for food.

Nare (n.) A nostril.

Nares (n. pl.) The nostrils or nasal openings, -- the anterior nares being the external or proper nostrils, and the posterior nares, the openings of the nasal cavities into the mouth or pharynx.

Nargile (n.) Alt. of Nargileh

Nargileh (n.) An apparatus for smoking tobacco. It has a long flexible tube, and the smoke is drawn through water.

Narica (n.) The brown coati. See Coati.

Nariform (a.) Formed like the nose.

Narine (a.) Of or belonging to the nostrils.

Narrable (a.) Capable of being narrated or told.

Narragansetts (n. pl.) A tribe of Indians who formerly inhabited the shores of Narragansett Bay.

Narrated (imp. & p. p.) of Narrate

Narrating (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Narrate

Narrate (v. t.) To tell, rehearse, or recite, as a story; to relate the particulars of; to go through with in detail, as an incident or transaction; to give an account of.

Narration (n.) The act of telling or relating the particulars of an event; rehearsal; recital.

Narration (n.) That which is related; the relation in words or writing of the particulars of any transaction or event, or of any series of transactions or events; story; history.

Narration (n.) That part of a discourse which recites the time, manner, or consequences of an action, or simply states the facts connected with the subject.

Narrative (a.) Of or pertaining to narration; relating to the particulars of an event or transaction.

Narrative (a.) Apt or inclined to relate stories, or to tell particulars of events; story-telling; garrulous.

Narrative (n.) That which is narrated; the recital of a story; a continuous account of the particulars of an event or transaction; a story.

Narratively (adv.) In the style of narration.

Narrator (n.) One who narrates; one who relates a series of events or transactions.

Narratory (a.) Giving an account of events; narrative; as, narratory letters.

Narre (a.) Nearer.

Narrow (superl.) Of little breadth; not wide or broad; having little distance from side to side; as, a narrow board; a narrow street; a narrow hem.

Narrow (superl.) Of little extent; very limited; circumscribed.

Narrow (superl.) Having but a little margin; having barely sufficient space, time, or number, etc.; close; near; -- with special reference to some peril or misfortune; as, a narrow shot; a narrow escape; a narrow majority.

Narrow (superl.) Limited as to means; straitened; pinching; as, narrow circumstances.

Narrow (superl.) Contracted; of limited scope; illiberal; bigoted; as, a narrow mind; narrow views.

Narrow (superl.) Parsimonious; niggardly; covetous; selfish.

Narrow (superl.) Scrutinizing in detail; close; accurate; exact.

Narrow (superl.) Formed (as a vowel) by a close position of some part of the tongue in relation to the palate; or (according to Bell) by a tense condition of the pharynx; -- distinguished from wide; as e (eve) and / (f/d), etc., from i (ill) and / (f/t), etc. See Guide to Pronunciation, / 13.

Narrows (pl. ) of Narrow

Narrow (n.) A narrow passage; esp., a contracted part of a stream, lake, or sea; a strait connecting two bodies of water; -- usually in the plural; as, The Narrows of New York harbor.

Narrowed (imp. & p. p.) of Narrow

Narrowing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Narrow

Narrow (v. t.) To lessen the breadth of; to contract; to draw into a smaller compass; to reduce the width or extent of.

Narrow (v. t.) To contract the reach or sphere of; to make less liberal or more selfish; to limit; to confine; to restrict; as, to narrow one's views or knowledge; to narrow a question in discussion.

Narrow (v. t.) To contract the size of, as a stocking, by taking two stitches into one.

Narrow (v. i.) To become less broad; to contract; to become narrower; as, the sea narrows into a strait.

Narrow (v. i.) Not to step out enough to the one hand or the other; as, a horse narrows.

Narrow (v. i.) To contract the size of a stocking or other knit article, by taking two stitches into one.

Narrower (n.) One who, or that which, narrows or contracts.

Narrowing (n.) The act of contracting, or of making or becoming less in breadth or extent.

Narrowing (n.) The part of a stocking which is narrowed.

Narrowly (adv.) With little breadth; in a narrow manner.

Narrowly (adv.) Without much extent; contractedly.

Narrowly (adv.) With minute scrutiny; closely; as, to look or watch narrowly; to search narrowly.

Narrowly (adv.) With a little margin or space; by a small distance; hence, closely; hardly; barely; only just; -- often with reference to an avoided danger or misfortune; as, he narrowly escaped.

Narrowly (adv.) Sparingly; parsimoniously.

Narrow-minded (a.) Of narrow mental scope; illiberal; mean.

Narrowness (n.) The condition or quality of being narrow.

Nart () Art not.

Narthex (n.) A tall umbelliferous plant (Ferula communis). See Giant fennel, under Fennel.

Narthex (n.) The portico in front of ancient churches; sometimes, the atrium or outer court surrounded by ambulatories; -- used, generally, for any vestibule, lobby, or outer porch, leading to the nave of a church.

Narwal (n.) See Narwhal.

Narwe (a.) Narrow.

Narwhal (n.) An arctic cetacean (Monodon monocerous), about twenty feet long. The male usually has one long, twisted, pointed canine tooth, or tusk projecting forward from the upper jaw like a horn, whence it is called also sea unicorn, unicorn fish, and unicorn whale. Sometimes two horns are developed, side by side.

Nas () Was not.

Nas () Has not.

Nasal (a.) Of or pertaining to the nose.

Nasal (a.) Having a quality imparted by means of the nose; and specifically, made by lowering the soft palate, in some cases with closure of the oral passage, the voice thus issuing (wholly or partially) through the nose, as in the consonants m, n, ng (see Guide to Pronunciation, // 20, 208); characterized by resonance in the nasal passage; as, a nasal vowel; a nasal utterance.

Nasal (n.) An elementary sound which is uttered through the nose, or through both the nose and the mouth simultaneously.

Nasal (n.) A medicine that operates through the nose; an errhine.

Nasal (n.) Part of a helmet projecting to protect the nose; a nose guard.

Nasal (n.) One of the nasal bones.

Nasal (n.) A plate, or scale, on the nose of a fish, etc.

Nasality (n.) The quality or state of being nasal.

Nasalization (n.) The act of nasalizing, or the state of being nasalized.

Nasalized (imp. & p. p.) of Nasalize

Nasalizing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Nasalize

Nasalize (v. t.) To render nasal, as sound; to insert a nasal or sound in.

Nasalize (v. t.) To utter words or letters with a nasal sound; to speak through the nose.

Nasally (adv.) In a nasal manner; by the nose.

Nascal (n.) A kind of pessary of medicated wool or cotton, formerly used.

Nascency (n.) State of being nascent; birth; beginning; origin.

Nascent (a.) Commencing, or in process of development; beginning to exist or to grow; coming into being; as, a nascent germ.

Nascent (a.) Evolving; being evolved or produced.

Naseberry (n.) A tropical fruit. See Sapodilla.

Nash (a.) Firm; stiff; hard; also, chilly.

Nasicornous (a.) Bearing a horn, or horns, on the nose, as the rhinoceros.

Nasiform (a.) Having the shape of a nose.

Nasion (n.) The middle point of the nasofrontal suture.

Naso- () A combining form denoting pertaining to, or connected with, the nose; as, nasofrontal.

Nasobuccal (a.) Connected with both the nose and the mouth; as, the nasobuccal groove in the skate.

Nasofrontal (a.) Of or pertaining to the nose and the front of the head; as, the embryonic nasofrontal process which forms the anterior boundary of the mouth.

Nasolachrymal (a.) Connected with the lachrymal apparatus and the nose; as, the nasolachrymal, or lachrymal duct.

Nasopalatal (a.) Alt. of Nasopalatine

Nasopalatine (a.) Connected with both the nose and the palate; as, the nasopalatine or incisor, canal connecting the mouth and the nasal chamber in some animals; the nasopalatine nerve.

Nasopharyngeal (a.) Of or pertaining to both throat and nose; as, a nasopharyngeal polypus.

Nasoseptal (a.) Of or pertaining to the internasal septum.

Nasoturbinal (a.) Connected with, or near, both the turbinal and the nasal bones; as, the nasalturbinal bone, made up of the uppermost lammelae of the ethmoturbinal, and sometimes united with the nasal.

Nasoturbinal (n.) The nasoturbinal bone.

Nassas (pl. ) of Nassa

NassAe (pl. ) of Nassa

Nassa (n.) Any species of marine gastropods, of the genera Nassa, Tritia, and other allied genera of the family Nassidae; a dog whelk. See Illust. under Gastropoda.

Nastily (adv.) In a nasty manner.

Nastiness (n.) The quality or state of being nasty; extreme filthness; dirtiness; also, indecency; obscenity.

Nasturtion (n.) Same as Nasturtium.

Nasturtium (n.) A genus of cruciferous plants, having white or yellowish flowers, including several species of cress. They are found chiefly in wet or damp grounds, and have a pungent biting taste.

Nasturtium (n.) Any plant of the genus Tropaeolum, geraniaceous herbs, having mostly climbing stems, peltate leaves, and spurred flowers, and including the common Indian cress (Tropaeolum majus), the canary-bird flower (T. peregrinum), and about thirty more species, all natives of South America. The whole plant has a warm pungent flavor, and the fleshy fruits are used as a substitute for capers, while the leaves and flowers are sometimes used in salads.

Nasty (superl.) Offensively filthy; very dirty, foul, or defiled; disgusting; nauseous.

Nasty (superl.) Hence, loosely: Offensive; disagreeable; unpropitious; wet; drizzling; as, a nasty rain, day, sky.

Nasty (superl.) Characterized by obcenity; indecent; indelicate; gross; filthy.

Nasute (a.) Having a nice sense of smell.

Nasute (a.) Critically nice; captious.

Nasutness (n.) Quickness of scent; hence, nice discernment; acuteness.

Nat (adv.) Not.

Nat () Not at; nor at.

Natal (a.) Of or pertaining to one's birth; accompying or dating from one's birth; native.

Natal (a.) Presiding over nativity; as, natal Jove.

Natalitial (a.) Alt. of Natalitious

Natalitious (a.) Of or pertaining to one's birth or birthday, or one's nativity.

Nataloin (n.) A bitter crystalline substance constituting the essential principle of Natal aloes. Cf. Aloon.

Natal plum () The drupaceous fruit of two South African shrubs of the genus Arduina (A. bispinosa and A. grandiflora).

Natals (n. pl.) One's birth, or the circumstances attending it.

Natant (a.) Floating in water, as the leaves of water lilies, or submersed, as those of many aquatic plants.

Natant (a.) Placed horizontally across the field, as if swimmimg toward the dexter side; said of all sorts of fishes except the flying fish.

Natantly (adv.) In a floating manner; swimmingly.

Natation (n.) The act of floating on the water; swimming.

Natatores (n. pl.) The swimming birds.

Natatorial (a.) Inclined or adapted to swim; swimming; as, natatorial birds.

Natatorious (a.) Adapted for swimming; -- said of the legs of certain insects.

Natatorium (n.) A swimming bath.

Natatory (a.) Adapted for swimming or floating; as, natatory organs.

Natch (n.) The rump of beef; esp., the lower and back part of the rump.

Natchez (n. pl.) A tribe of Indians who formerly lived near the site of the city of Natchez, Mississippi. In 1729 they were subdued by the French; the survivors joined the Creek Confederacy.

Natchnee (n.) An annual grass (Eleusine coracona), cultivated in India as a food plant.

Nates (n. pl.) The buttocks.

Nates (n. pl.) The two anterior of the four lobes on the dorsal side of the midbrain of most mammals; the anterior optic lobes.

Nates (n. pl.) The umbones of a bivalve shell.

Nath () hath not.

Nathless (conj.) Nevertheless.

Nathmore (adv.) Not the more; never the more.

Naticas (pl. ) of Natica

NaticAe (pl. ) of Natica

Natica (n.) Any one of numerous species of marine gastropods belonging to Natica, Lunatia, Neverita, and other allied genera (family Naticidae.) They burrow beneath the sand, or mud, and drill other shells.

Naticoid (a.) Like or belonging to Natica, or the family Naticidae.

Nation (n.) A part, or division, of the people of the earth, distinguished from the rest by common descent, language, or institutions; a race; a stock.

Nation (n.) The body of inhabitants of a country, united under an independent government of their own.

Nation (n.) Family; lineage.

Nation (n.) One of the divisions of university students in a classification according to nativity, formerly common in Europe.

Nation (n.) One of the four divisions (named from the parts of Scotland) in which students were classified according to their nativity.

Nation (n.) A great number; a great deal; -- by way of emphasis; as, a nation of herbs.

National (a.) Of or pertaining to a nation; common to a whole people or race; public; general; as, a national government, language, dress, custom, calamity, etc.

National (a.) Attached to one's own country or nation.

Nationalism (n.) The state of being national; national attachment; nationality.

Nationalism (n.) An idiom, trait, or character peculiar to any nation.

Nationalism (n.) National independence; the principles of the Nationalists.

Nationalist (n.) One who advocates national unity and independence; one of a party favoring Irish independence.

Nationalities (pl. ) of Nationality

Nationality (n.) The quality of being national, or strongly attached to one's own nation; patriotism.

Nationality (n.) The sum of the qualities which distinguish a nation; national character.

Nationality (n.) A race or people, as determined by common language and character, and not by political bias or divisions; a nation.

Nationality (n.) Existence as a distinct or individual nation; national unity and integrity.

Nationality (n.) The state or quality of belonging to or being connected with a nation or government by nativity, character, ownership, allegiance, etc.

Nationalization (n.) The act of nationalizing, or the state of being nationalized.

Nationalized (imp. & p. p.) of Nationalize

Nationalizing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Nationalize

Nationalize (v. t.) To make national; to make a nation of; to endow with the character and habits of a nation, or the peculiar sentiments and attachment of citizens of a nation.

Nationally (adv.) In a national manner or way; as a nation.

Nationalness (n.) The quality or state of being national; nationality.

Native (a.) Arising by birth; having an origin; born.

Native (a.) Of or pertaining to one's birth; natal; belonging to the place or the circumstances in which one is born; -- opposed to foreign; as, native land, language, color, etc.

Native (a.) Born in the region in which one lives; as, a native inhabitant, race; grown or originating in the region where used or sold; not foreign or imported; as, native oysters, or strawberries.

Native (a.) Original; constituting the original substance of anything; as, native dust.

Native (a.) Conferred by birth; derived from origin; born with one; inherent; inborn; not acquired; as, native genius, cheerfulness, simplicity, rights, etc.

Native (a.) Naturally related; cognate; connected (with).

Native (a.) Found in nature uncombined with other elements; as, native silver.

Native (a.) Found in nature; not artificial; as native sodium chloride.

Native (n.) One who, or that which, is born in a place or country referred to; a denizen by birth; an animal, a fruit, or vegetable, produced in a certain region; as, a native of France.

Native (n.) Any of the live stock found in a region, as distinguished from such as belong to pure and distinct imported breeds.

Natively (adv.) By natural or original condition; naturally; originally.

Nativeness (n.) The quality or state of being native.

Nativism (n.) The disposition to favor the native inhabitants of a country, in preference to immigrants from foreign countries.

Nativism (n.) The doctrine of innate ideas, or that the mind possesses forms of thought independent of sensation.

Nativist (n.) An advocate of nativism.

Nativistic (a.) Relating to nativism.

Nativies (pl. ) of Nativity

Nativity (n.) The coming into life or into the world; birth; also, the circumstances attending birth, as time, place, manner, etc.

Nativity (n.) A picture representing or symbolizing the early infancy of Christ. The simplest form is the babe in a rude cradle, and the heads of an ox and an ass to express the stable in which he was born.

Nativity (n.) A representation of the positions of the heavenly bodies as the moment of one's birth, supposed to indicate his future destinies; a horoscope.

Natka (a.) A species of shrike.

Natrium (n.) The technical name for sodium.

Natrolite (n.) A zeolite occuring in groups of glassy acicular crystals, and in masses which often have a radiated structure. It is a hydrous silicate of alumina and soda.

Natron (n.) Native sodium carbonate.

Natter (v. i.) To find fault; to be peevish.

Natterjack (n.) A European toad (Bufo calamita), having a yellow line along its back.

Natty (a.) Neat; tidy; spruce.

Natural (a.) Fixed or determined by nature; pertaining to the constitution of a thing; belonging to native character; according to nature; essential; characteristic; not artifical, foreign, assumed, put on, or acquired; as, the natural growth of animals or plants; the natural motion of a gravitating body; natural strength or disposition; the natural heat of the body; natural color.

Natural (a.) Conformed to the order, laws, or actual facts, of nature; consonant to the methods of nature; according to the stated course of things, or in accordance with the laws which govern events, feelings, etc.; not exceptional or violent; legitimate; normal; regular; as, the natural consequence of crime; a natural death.

Natural (a.) Having to do with existing system to things; dealing with, or derived from, the creation, or the world of matter and mind, as known by man; within the scope of human reason or experience; not supernatural; as, a natural law; natural science; history, theology.

Natural (a.) Conformed to truth or reality

Natural (a.) Springing from true sentiment; not artifical or exaggerated; -- said of action, delivery, etc.; as, a natural gesture, tone, etc.

Natural (a.) Resembling the object imitated; true to nature; according to the life; -- said of anything copied or imitated; as, a portrait is natural.

Natural (a.) Having the character or sentiments properly belonging to one's position; not unnatural in feelings.

Natural (a.) Connected by the ties of consanguinity.

Natural (a.) Begotten without the sanction of law; born out of wedlock; illegitimate; bastard; as, a natural child.

Natural (a.) Of or pertaining to the lower or animal nature, as contrasted with the higher or moral powers, or that which is spiritual; being in a state of nature; unregenerate.

Natural (a.) Belonging to, to be taken in, or referred to, some system, in which the base is 1; -- said or certain functions or numbers; as, natural numbers, those commencing at 1; natural sines, cosines, etc., those taken in arcs whose radii are 1.

Natural (a.) Produced by natural organs, as those of the human throat, in distinction from instrumental music.

Natural (a.) Of or pertaining to a key which has neither a flat nor a sharp for its signature, as the key of C major.

Natural (a.) Applied to an air or modulation of harmony which moves by easy and smooth transitions, digressing but little from the original key.

Natural (n.) A native; an aboriginal.

Natural (n.) Natural gifts, impulses, etc.

Natural (n.) One born without the usual powers of reason or understanding; an idiot.

Natural (n.) A character [/] used to contradict, or to remove the effect of, a sharp or flat which has preceded it, and to restore the unaltered note.

Naturalism (n.) A state of nature; conformity to nature.

Naturalism (n.) The doctrine of those who deny a supernatural agency in the miracles and revelations recorded in the Bible, and in spiritual influences; also, any system of philosophy which refers the phenomena of nature to a blind force or forces acting necessarily or according to fixed laws, excluding origination or direction by one intelligent will.

Naturalist (n.) One versed in natural science; a student of natural history, esp. of the natural history of animals.

Naturalist (n.) One who holds or maintains the doctrine of naturalism in religion.

Naturalistic (a.) Belonging to the doctrines of naturalism.

Naturalistic (a.) Closely resembling nature; realistic.

Naturality (n.) Nature; naturalness.

Naturalization (n.) The act or process of naturalizing, esp. of investing an alien with the rights and privileges of a native or citizen; also, the state of being naturalized.

Naturalized (imp. & p. p.) of Naturalize

Naturalizing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Naturalize

Naturalize (v. t.) To make natural; as, custom naturalizes labor or study.

Naturalize (v. t.) To confer the rights and privileges of a native subject or citizen on; to make as if native; to adopt, as a foreigner into a nation or state, and place in the condition of a native subject.

Naturalize (v. t.) To receive or adopt as native, natural, or vernacular; to make one's own; as, to naturalize foreign words.

Naturalize (v. t.) To adapt; to accustom; to habituate; to acclimate; to cause to grow as under natural conditions.

Naturalize (v. i.) To become as if native.

Naturalize (v. i.) To explain phenomena by natural agencies or laws, to the exclusion of the supernatural.

Naturally (adv.) In a natural manner or way; according to the usual course of things; spontaneously.

Naturalness (n.) The state or quality of being natural; conformity to nature.

Nature (n.) The existing system of things; the world of matter, or of matter and mind; the creation; the universe.

Nature (n.) The personified sum and order of causes and effects; the powers which produce existing phenomena, whether in the total or in detail; the agencies which carry on the processes of creation or of being; -- often conceived of as a single and separate entity, embodying the total of all finite agencies and forces as disconnected from a creating or ordering intelligence.

Nature (n.) The established or regular course of things; usual order of events; connection of cause and effect.

Nature (n.) Conformity to that which is natural, as distinguished from that which is artifical, or forced, or remote from actual experience.

Nature (n.) The sum of qualities and attributes which make a person or thing what it is, as distinct from others; native character; inherent or essential qualities or attributes; peculiar constitution or quality of being.

Nature (n.) Hence: Kind, sort; character; quality.

Nature (n.) Physical constitution or existence; the vital powers; the natural life.

Nature (n.) Natural affection or reverence.

Nature (n.) Constitution or quality of mind or character.

Nature (v. t.) To endow with natural qualities.

Natured (a.) Having (such) a nature, temper, or disposition; disposed; -- used in composition; as, good-natured, ill-natured, etc.

Natureless (a.) Not in accordance with nature; unnatural.

Naturism (n.) The belief or doctrine that attributes everything to nature as a sanative agent.

Naturist (n.) One who believes in, or conforms to, the theory of naturism.

Naturity (n.) The quality or state of being produced by nature.

Naturize (v. t.) To endow with a nature or qualities; to refer to nature.

Naufrage (n.) Shipwreck; ruin.

Naufragous (a.) causing shipwreck.

Naught (adv.) Nothing.

Naught (adv.) The arithmetical character 0; a cipher. See Cipher.

Naught (adv.) In no degree; not at all.

Naught (a.) Of no value or account; worthless; bad; useless.

Naught (a.) Hence, vile; base; naughty.

Naughtily (adv.) In a naughty manner; wickedly; perversely.

Naughtiness (n.) The quality or state of being naughty; perverseness; badness; wickedness.

Naughtly (adv.) Naughtily; wrongly.

Naughty (superl.) Having little or nothing.

Naughty (superl.) Worthless; bad; good for nothing.

Naughty (superl.) hence, corrupt; wicked.

Naughty (superl.) Mischievous; perverse; froward; guilty of disobedient or improper conduct; as, a naughty child.

Naumachy (n.) A naval battle; esp., a mock sea fight.

Naumachy (n.) A show or spectacle representing a sea fight; also, a place for such exhibitions.

Nauplii (pl. ) of Nauplius

Nauplius (n.) A crustacean larva having three pairs of locomotive organs (corresponding to the antennules, antennae, and mandibles), a median eye, and little or no segmentation of the body.

Nauropometer (n.) An instrument for measuring the amount which a ship heels at sea.

Nauscopy (n.) The power or act of discovering ships or land at considerable distances.

Nausea (n.) Seasickness; hence, any similar sickness of the stomach accompanied with a propensity to vomit; qualm; squeamishness of the stomach; loathing.

Nauseant (n.) A substance which produces nausea.

Nauseated (imp. & p. p.) of Nauseate

Nauseating (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Nauseate

Nauseate (v. i.) To become squeamish; to feel nausea; to turn away with disgust.

Nauseate (v. t.) To affect with nausea; to sicken; to cause to feel loathing or disgust.

Nauseate (v. t.) To sicken at; to reject with disgust; to loathe.

Nauseation (n.) The act of nauseating, or the state of being nauseated.

Nauseative (a.) Causing nausea; nauseous.

Nauseous (a.) Causing, or fitted to cause, nausea; sickening; loathsome; disgusting; exciting abhorrence; as, a nauseous drug or medicine.

Nautch (n.) An entertainment consisting chiefly of dancing by professional dancing (or Nautch) girls.

Nautic (a.) Nautical.

Nautical (a.) Of or pertaining to seamen, to the art of navigation, or to ships; as, nautical skill.

Nautically (adv.) In a nautical manner; with reference to nautical affairs.

Nautiform (a.) Shaped like the hull of a ship.

Nautilite (n.) A fossil nautilus.

Nautiloid (a.) Like or pertaining to the nautilus; shaped like a nautilus shell.

Nautiloid (n.) A mollusk, or shell, of the genus Nautilus or family Nautilidae.

Nautiluses (pl. ) of Nautilus

Nautili (pl. ) of Nautilus

Nautilus (n.) The only existing genus of tetrabranchiate cephalopods. About four species are found living in the tropical Pacific, but many other species are found fossil. The shell is spiral, symmetrical, and chambered, or divided into several cavities by simple curved partitions, which are traversed and connected together by a continuous and nearly central tube or siphuncle. See Tetrabranchiata.

Nautilus (n.) The argonaut; -- also called paper nautilus. See Argonauta, and Paper nautilus, under Paper.

Nautilus (n.) A variety of diving bell, the lateral as well as vertical motions of which are controlled, by the occupants.

Navajoes (n. pl.) A tribe of Indians inhabiting New Mexico and Arizona, allied to the Apaches. They are now largely engaged in agriculture.

Naval (a.) Having to do with shipping; of or pertaining to ships or a navy; consisting of ships; as, naval forces, successes, stores, etc.

Navals (n.pl.) Naval affairs.

Navarch (n.) The commander of a fleet.

Navarchy (n.) Nautical skill or experience.

Navarrese (a.) Of or pertaining to Navarre.

Navarrese (n. sing. & pl.) A native or inhabitant of Navarre; the people of Navarre.

Nave (n.) The block in the center of a wheel, from which the spokes radiate, and through which the axle passes; -- called also hub or hob.

Nave (n.) The navel.

Nave (n.) The middle or body of a church, extending from the transepts to the principal entrances, or, if there are no transepts, from the choir to the principal entrance, but not including the aisles.

Navel (n.) A mark or depression in the middle of the abdomen; the umbilicus. See Umbilicus.

Navel (n.) The central part or point of anything; the middle.

Navel (n.) An eye on the under side of a carronade for securing it to a carriage.

Navel-string (n.) The umbilical cord.

Navelwort (n.) A European perennial succulent herb (Cotyledon umbilicus), having round, peltate leaves with a central depression; -- also called pennywort, and kidneywort.

Navew (n.) A kind of small turnip, a variety of Brassica campestris. See Brassica.

Navicular (a.) Of, pertaining to, or resembling, a boat or ship.

Navicular (a.) Shaped like a boat; cymbiform; scaphoid; as, the navicular glumes of most grasses; the navicular bone.

Navicular (n.) The navicular bone.

Navigability (n.) The quality or condition of being navigable; navigableness.

Navigable (a.) Capable of being navigated; deep enough and wide enough to afford passage to vessels; as, a navigable river.

Navigated (imp. & p. p.) of Navigate

Navigating (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Navigate

Navigate (v. i.) To joirney by water; to go in a vessel or ship; to perform the duties of a navigator; to use the waters as a highway or channel for commerce or communication; to sail.

Navigate (v. t.) To pass over in ships; to sail over or on; as, to navigate the Atlantic.

Navigate (v. t.) To steer, direct, or manage in sailing; to conduct (ships) upon the water by the art or skill of seamen; as, to navigate a ship.

Navigation (n.) The act of navigating; the act of passing on water in ships or other vessels; the state of being navigable.

Navigation (n.) the science or art of conducting ships or vessels from one place to another, including, more especially, the method of determining a ship's position, course, distance passed over, etc., on the surface of the globe, by the principles of geometry and astronomy.

Navigation (n.) The management of sails, rudder, etc.; the mechanics of traveling by water; seamanship.

Navigation (n.) Ships in general.

Navigator (n.) One who navigates or sails; esp., one who direct the course of a ship, or one who is skillful in the art of navigation; also, a book which teaches the art of navigation; as, Bowditch's Navigator.

Navigerous (a.) Bearing ships; capable of floating vessels.

Navies (pl. ) of Navvy

Navvy (n.) Originally, a laborer on canals for internal navigation; hence, a laborer on other public works, as in building railroads, embankments, etc.

Navies (pl. ) of Navy

Navy (n.) A fleet of ships; an assemblage of merchantmen, or so many as sail in company.

Navy (n.) The whole of the war vessels belonging to a nation or ruler, considered collectively; as, the navy of Italy.

Navy (n.) The officers and men attached to the war vessels of a nation; as, he belongs to the navy.

Nawab (n.) A deputy ruler or viceroy in India; also, a title given by courtesy to other persons of high rank in the East.

Nawl (n.) An awl.

Nay (adv.) No; -- a negative answer to a question asked, or a request made, now superseded by no. See Yes.

Nay (adv.) Not this merely, but also; not only so, but; -- used to mark the addition or substitution of a more explicit or more emphatic phrase.

Nays (pl. ) of Nay

Nay (n.) Denial; refusal.

Nay (n.) a negative vote; one who votes in the negative.

Nay (v. t. & i.) To refuse.

Nayaur (n.) A specied of wild sheep (Ovis Hodgsonii), native of Nepaul and Thibet. It has a dorsal mane and a white ruff beneath the neck.

Nayt (v. t.) To refuse; to deny.

Nayward (n.) The negative side.

Nayword (n.) A byword; a proverb; also, a watchword.

Nazarene (n.) A native or inhabitant of Nazareth; -- a term of contempt applied to Christ and the early Christians.

Nazarene (n.) One of a sect of Judaizing Christians in the first and second centuries, who observed the laws of Moses, and held to certain heresies.

Nazarite (n.) A Jew bound by a vow to lave the hair uncut, to abstain from wine and strong drink, and to practice extraordinary purity of life and devotion, the obligation being for life, or for a certain time. The word is also used adjectively.

Nazariteship (n.) The state of a Nazarite.

Nazaritic (a.) Of or pertaining to a Nazarite, or to Nazarites.

Nazaritism (n.) The vow and practice of a Nazarite.

Naze (n.) A promotory or headland.

Nazirite (n.) A Nazarite.

Ne (adv.) Not; never.

Ne (adv.) Nor.

Neaf (n.) See 2d Neif.

Neal (v. t.) To anneal.

Neal (v. i.) To be tempered by heat.

Neap (n.) The tongue or pole of a cart or other vehicle drawn by two animals.

Neap (a.) Low.

Neap (n.) A neap tide.

Neaped (a.) Left aground on the height of a spring tide, so that it will not float till the next spring tide; -- called also beneaped.

Neapolitan (a.) Of of pertaining to Naples in Italy.

Neapolitan (n.) A native or citizen of Naples.

Near (adv.) At a little distance, in place, time, manner, or degree; not remote; nigh.

Near (adv.) Nearly; almost; well-nigh.

Near (adv.) Closely; intimately.

Near (adv.) Not far distant in time, place, or degree; not remote; close at hand; adjacent; neighboring; nigh.

Near (adv.) Closely connected or related.

Near (adv.) Close to one's interests, affection, etc.; touching, or affecting intimately; intimate; dear; as, a near friend.

Near (adv.) Close to anything followed or imitated; not free, loose, or rambling; as, a version near to the original.

Near (adv.) So as barely to avoid or pass injury or loss; close; narrow; as, a near escape.

Near (adv.) Next to the driver, when he is on foot; in the Unted States, on the left of an animal or a team; as, the near ox; the near leg. See Off side, under Off, a.

Near (a) Immediate; direct; close; short.

Near (a) Close-fisted; parsimonious.

Near (prep.) Adjacent to; close by; not far from; nigh; as, the ship sailed near the land. See the Note under near, a.

Neared (imp. & p. p.) of Near

Nearing (p. pr. & vb. n) of Near

Near (adv.) To approach; to come nearer; as, the ship neared the land.

Near (v. i.) To draw near; to approach.

Nearctic (a.) Of or pertaining to a region of the earth's surface including all of temperate and arctic North America and Greenland. In the geographical distribution of animals, this region is marked off as the habitat certain species.

Nearhand (a. & adv.) Near; near at hand; closely.

Near-legged (a.) Having the feet so near together that they interfere in traveling.

Nearly (adv.) In a near manner; not remotely; closely; intimately; almost.

Nearness (n.) The state or quality of being near; -- used in the various senses of the adjective.

Nearsighted (a.) Seeing distinctly at short distances only; shortsighted.

Nearsightedness (n.) See Myopic, and Myopia.

Neat (n. sing. & pl.) Cattle of the genus Bos, as distinguished from horses, sheep, and goats; an animal of the genus Bos; as, a neat's tongue; a neat's foot.

Neat (n.) Of or pertaining to the genus Bos, or to cattle of that genus; as, neat cattle.

Neat (a.) Free from that which soils, defiles, or disorders; clean; cleanly; tidy.

Neat (a.) Free from what is unbecoming, inappropriate, or tawdry; simple and becoming; pleasing with simplicity; tasteful; chaste; as, a neat style; a neat dress.

Neat (a.) Free from admixture or adulteration; good of its kind; as, neat brandy.

Neat (a.) Excellent in character, skill, or performance, etc.; nice; finished; adroit; as, a neat design; a neat thief.

Neat (a.) With all deductions or allowances made; net. [In this sense usually written net. See Net, a., 3.]

'Neath (prep. & adv.) An abbreviation of Beneath.

Neatherd (n.) A person who has the care of neat cattle; a cowherd.

Neathouse (n.) A building for the shelter of neat cattle.

Neatify (v. t.) To make neat.

Neatly (adv.) In a neat manner; tidily; tastefully.

neatness (n.) The state or quality of being neat.

Neatress (n.) A woman who takes care of cattle.

Neb (n.) The nose; the snout; the mouth; the beak of a bird; a nib, as of a pen.

Nebalia (n.) A genus of small marine Crustacea, considered the type of a distinct order (Nebaloidea, or Phyllocarida.)

Neb-neb (n.) Same as Bablh.

Nebulae (pl. ) of Nebula

Nebula (n.) A faint, cloudlike, self-luminous mass of matter situated beyond the solar system among the stars. True nebulae are gaseous; but very distant star clusters often appear like them in the telescope.

Nebula (n.) A white spot or a slight opacity of the cornea.

Nebula (n.) A cloudy appearance in the urine.

Nebular (a.) Of or pertaining to nebulae; of the nature of, or resembling, a nebula.

Nebulated (a.) Clouded with indistinct color markings, as an animal.

nebulation (n.) The condition of being nebulated; also, a clouded, or ill-defined, color mark.

Nebule (n.) A little cloud; a cloud.

Nebule (a.) Alt. of Nebuly

Nebuly (a.) Composed of successive short curves supposed to resemble a cloud; -- said of a heraldic line by which an ordinary or subordinary may be bounded.

Nebulization (n.) The act or process of nebulizing; atomization.

Nebulize (v. t.) To reduce (as a liquid) to a fine spray or vapor; to atomize.

Nebulizer (n.) An atomizer.

Nebulose (a.) Nebulous; cloudy.

Nebulosity (n.) The state or quality of being nebulous; cloudiness; hazeness; mistiness; nebulousness.

Nebulosity (n.) The stuff of which a nebula is formed.

Nebulosity (n.) A nebula.

Nebulous (a.) Cloudy; hazy; misty.

Nebulous (a.) Of, pertaining to, or having the appearance of, a nebula; nebular; cloudlike.

Nebuly (n.) A line or a direction composed of successive short curves or waves supposed to resembe a cloud. See NEbulE

Necessarian (n.) An advocate of the doctrine of philosophical necessity; a nacessitarian.

Necessarian (a.) Of or pertaining to necessarianism.

Necessarianism (n.) The doctrine of philosophical necessity; necessitarianism.

Necessarily (adv.) In a necessary manner; by necessity; unavoidably; indispensably.

Necessariness (n.) The quality of being necessary.

Necessary (a.) Such as must be; impossible to be otherwise; not to be avoided; inevitable.

Necessary (a.) Impossible to be otherwise, or to be dispensed with, without preventing the attainment of a desired result; indispensable; requiste; essential.

Necessary (a.) Acting from necessity or compulsion; involuntary; -- opposed to free; as, whether man is a necessary or a free agent is a question much discussed.

Necessaries (pl. ) of Necessary

Necessary (n.) A thing that is necessary or indispensable to some purpose; something that one can not do without; a requisite; an essential; -- used chiefly in the plural; as, the necessaries of life.

Necessary (n.) A privy; a water-closet.

Necessary (n.) Such things, in respect to infants, lunatics, and married women, as are requisite for support suitable to station.

Necessitarian (a.) Of or pertaining to the doctrine of philosophical necessity in regard to the origin and existence of things, especially as applied to the actings or choices of the will; -- opposed to libertarian.

Necessitarian (n.) One who holds to the doctrine of necessitarianism.

Necessitarianism (n.) The doctrine of philosophical necessity; the doctrine that results follow by invariable sequence from causes, and esp. that the will is not free, but that human actions and choices result inevitably from motives; deteminism.

Necessitated (imp. & p. p.) of Necessitate

Necessitating (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Necessitate

Necessitate (v. t.) To make necessary or indispensable; to render unaviolable.

Necessitate (v. t.) To reduce to the necessity of; to force; to compel.

Necessitattion (n.) The act of making necessary, or the state of being made necessary; compulsion.

Necessitied (a.) In a state of want; necessitous.

Necessitous (a.) Very needy or indigent; pressed with poverty.

Necessitous (a.) Narrow; destitute; pinching; pinched; as, necessitous circumstances.

Necessitude (n.) Necessitousness; want.

Necessitude (n.) Necessary connection or relation.

Necessities (pl. ) of Necessity

Necessity (n.) The quality or state of being necessary, unavoidable, or absolutely requisite; inevitableness; indispensableness.

Necessity (n.) The condition of being needy or necessitous; pressing need; indigence; want.

Necessity (n.) That which is necessary; a necessary; a requisite; something indispensable; -- often in the plural.

Necessity (n.) That which makes an act or an event unavoidable; irresistible force; overruling power; compulsion, physical or moral; fate; fatality.

Necessity (n.) The negation of freedom in voluntary action; the subjection of all phenomena, whether material or spiritual, to inevitable causation; necessitarianism.

Neck (n.) The part of an animal which connects the head and the trunk, and which, in man and many other animals, is more slender than the trunk.

Neck (n.) Any part of an inanimate object corresponding to or resembling the neck of an animal

Neck (n.) The long slender part of a vessel, as a retort, or of a fruit, as a gourd.

Neck (n.) A long narrow tract of land projecting from the main body, or a narrow tract connecting two larger tracts.

Neck (n.) That part of a violin, guitar, or similar instrument, which extends from the head to the body, and on which is the finger board or fret board.

Neck (n.) A reduction in size near the end of an object, formed by a groove around it; as, a neck forming the journal of a shaft.

Neck (n.) the point where the base of the stem of a plant arises from the root.

Necked (imp. & p. p.) of Neck

Necking (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Neck

Neck (v. t.) To reduce the diameter of (an object) near its end, by making a groove around it; -- used with down; as, to neck down a shaft.

Neck (v. t. & i.) To kiss and caress amorously.

Neckar nut () See Nicker nut.

Neckband (n.) A band which goes around the neck; often, the part at the top of a garment.

Neckcloth (n.) A piece of any fabric worn around the neck.

Necked (a.) Having (such) a neck; -- chiefly used in composition; as, stiff-necked.

Necked (a.) Cracked; -- said of a treenail.

Neckerchief (n.) A kerchief for the neck; -- called also neck handkerchief.

Necking (n.) Same as Neckmold.

Necklace (n.) A string of beads, etc., or any continuous band or chain, worn around the neck as an ornament.

Necklace (n.) A rope or chain fitted around the masthead to hold hanging blocks for jibs and stays.

necklaced (a.) Wearing a necklace; marked as with a necklace.

neckland (n.) A neck of land.

necklet (n.) A necklace.

Neckmold (n.) Alt. of Neckmould

Neckmould (n.) A small convex molding surrounding a column at the jinction of the shaft and capital.

Neckplate (n.) See Gorget, 1 and 2.

Necktie (n.) A scarf, band, or kerchief of silk, etc., passing around the neck or collar and tied in front; a bow of silk, etc., fastened in front of the neck.

Neckwear (n.) A collective term for cravats, collars, etc.

Neckweed (n.) An American annual weed (veronica peregrina), with small white flowers and a roundish pod.

Neckweed (n.) The hemp; -- so called as furnishing ropes for hanging criminals.

Necrobiosis (n.) The death of a part by molecular disintegration and without loss of continuity, as in the processes of degeneration and atrophy.

Necrobiotic (a.) Of or pertaining to necrobiosis; as, a necrobiotic metamorphosis.

Necrolatry (n.) The worship of the dead; manes worship.

Necrolite (n.) Same as Necronite.

Necrologic (a.) Alt. of Necrological

Necrological (a.) Of or pertaining to necrology; of the nature of necrology; relating to, or giving, an account of the dead, or of deaths.

Necrologist (n.) One who gives an account of deaths.

Necrologies (pl. ) of Necrology

Necrology (n.) An account of deaths, or of the dead; a register of deaths; a collection of obituary notices.

Necromancer (n.) One who practices necromancy; a sorcerer; a wizard.

Necromancy (n.) The art of revealing future events by means of a pretended communication with the dead; the black art; hence, magic in general; conjuration; enchantment. See Black art.

Necromantic (n.) Conjuration.

Necromantic (a.) Alt. of Necromantical

Necromantical (a.) Of or pertaining to necromancy; performed by necromancy.

Necronite (n.) Fetid feldspar, a mineral which, when struck, exhales a fetid odor.

Necrophagan (a.) Eating carrion.

Necrophagan (n.) Any species of a tribe (Necrophaga) of beetles which, in the larval state, feed on carrion; a burying beetle.

Necrophagous (a.) Of or pertaining to the Necrophaga; eating carrion. See Necrophagan.

Necrophobia (n.) An exaggerated fear of death or horror of dead bodies.

Necrophore (n.) Any one of numerous species of beetles of the genus Necrophorus and allied genera; -- called also burying beetle, carrion beetle, sexton beetle.

Necropolises (pl. ) of Necropolis

Necropolis (n.) A city of the dead; a name given by the ancients to their cemeteries, and sometimes applied to modern burial places; a graveyard.

Necropsy (n.) A post-mortem examination or inspection; an autopsy. See Autopsy.

Necroscopic (a.) Alt. of Necroscopical

Necroscopical (a.) Or or relating to post-mortem examinations.

Necrose (v. t. & i.) To affect with necrosis; to unergo necrosis.

Necrosed (a.) Affected by necrosis; dead; as, a necrosed bone.

Necrosis (n.) Mortification or gangrene of bone, or the death of a bone or portion of a bone in mass, as opposed to its death by molecular disintegration. See Caries.

Necrosis (n.) A disease of trees, in which the branches gradually dry up from the bark to the center.

Necrotic (a.) Affected with necrosis; as, necrotic tissue; characterized by, or producing, necrosis; as, a necrotic process.

Nectar (n.) The drink of the gods (as ambrosia was their food); hence, any delicious or inspiring beverage.

Nectar (n.) A sweetish secretion of blossoms from which bees make honey.

Nectareal (a.) Nectareous.

Nectareal (a.) Of or pertaining to a nectary.

Nectarean (a.) Resembling nectar; very sweet and pleasant.

Nectared (a.) Imbued with nectar; mingled with nectar; abounding with nectar.

Nectareous (a.) Of, pertaining to, containing, or resembling nectar; delicious; nectarean.

Nectarial (a.) Of or pertaining to the nectary of a plant.

Nectaried (a.) Having a nectary.

Nectariferous (a.) Secreting nectar; -- said of blossoms or their parts.

Nectarine (a.) Nectareous.

Nectarine (n.) A smooth-skinned variety of peach.

Nectarized (imp. & p. p.) of Nectarize

Nectarizing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Nectarize

Nectarize (v. t.) To mingle or infuse with nectar; to sweeten.

Nectarous (a.) Nectareous.

Nectaries (pl. ) of Nectary

Nectary (n.) That part of a blossom which secretes nectar, usually the base of the corolla or petals; also, the spur of such flowers as the larkspur and columbine, whether nectariferous or not. See the Illustration of Nasturtium.

Nectocalyces (pl. ) of Nectocalyx

Nectocalyx (n.) The swimming bell or umbrella of a jellyfish of medusa.

Nectocalyx (n.) One of the zooids of certain Siphonophora, having somewhat the form, and the essential structure, of the bell of a jellyfish, and acting as a swimming organ.

Nectosac (n.) Alt. of Nectosack

Nectosack (n.) The cavity of a nectocalyx.

Nectostem (n.) That portion of the axis which bears the nectocalyces in the Siphonophora.

Nedder (n.) An adder.

Neddies (pl. ) of Neddy

Neddy (n.) A pet name for a donkey.

Nee (p. p., fem.) Born; -- a term sometimes used in introducing the name of the family to which a married woman belongs by birth; as, Madame de Stael, nee Necker.

Need (n.) A state that requires supply or relief; pressing occasion for something; necessity; urgent want.

Need (n.) Want of the means of subsistence; poverty; indigence; destitution.

Need (n.) That which is needful; anything necessary to be done; (pl.) necessary things; business.

Need (n.) Situation of need; peril; danger.

Needed (imp. & p. p.) of Need

Needing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Need

Need (n.) To be in want of; to have cause or occasion for; to lack; to require, as supply or relief.

Need (v. i.) To be wanted; to be necessary.

Need (adv.) Of necessity. See Needs.

Needer (n.) One who needs anything.

Needful (a.) Full of need; in need or want; needy; distressing.

Needful (a.) Necessary for supply or relief; requisite.

Needily (adv.) In a needy condition or manner; necessarily.

Neediness (n.) The state or quality of being needy; want; poverty; indigence.

Needle (n.) A small instrument of steel, sharply pointed at one end, with an eye to receive a thread, -- used in sewing.

Needle (n.) See Magnetic needle, under Magnetic.

Needle (n.) A slender rod or wire used in knitting; a knitting needle; also, a hooked instrument which carries the thread or twine, and by means of which knots or loops are formed in the process of netting, knitting, or crocheting.

Needle (n.) One of the needle-shaped secondary leaves of pine trees. See Pinus.

Needle (n.) Any slender, pointed object, like a needle, as a pointed crystal, a sharp pinnacle of rock, an obelisk, etc.

Needle (v. t.) To form in the shape of a needle; as, to needle crystals.

Needle (v. i.) To form needles; to crystallize in the form of needles.

Needlebook (n.) A book-shaped needlecase, having leaves of cloth into which the needles are stuck.

Needlecase (n.) A case to keep needles.

Needlefish (n.) The European great pipefich (Siphostoma, / Syngnathus, acus); -- called also earl, and tanglefish.

Needlefish (n.) The garfish.

needlefuls (pl. ) of needleful

needleful (n.) As much thread as is used in a needle at one time.

Needle-pointed (a.) Pointed as needles.

Needler (n.) One who makes or uses needles; also, a dealer in needles.

Needless (a.) Having no need.

Needless (a.) Not wanted; unnecessary; not requiste; as, needless labor; needless expenses.

Needless (a.) Without sufficient cause; groundless; cuseless.

Needlestone (n.) Natrolite; -- called also needle zeolite.

Needlewomen (pl. ) of Needlewoman

Needlewoman (n.) A woman who does needlework; a seamstress.

Needlework (n.) Work executed with a needle; sewed work; sewing; embroidery; also, the business of a seamstress.

Needlework (n.) The combination of timber and plaster making the outside framework of some houses.

Needly (a.) Like a needle or needles; as, a needly horn; a needly beard.

Needly (adv.) Necessarily; of necessity.

Needment (n.) Something needed or wanted.

Needment (n.) Outfit; necessary luggage.

Needs (adv.) Of necessity; necessarily; indispensably; -- often with must, and equivalent to of need.

Needscost (adv.) Of necessity.

Needsly (adv.) Of necessity.

Needy (superl.) Distressed by want of the means of living; very por; indigent; necessitous.

Needy (superl.) Necessary; requiste.

Neeld (n.) Alt. of Neele

Neele (n.) A needle.

Neelghau (n.) See Nylghau.

Neem tree () An Asiatic name for Melia Azadirachta, and M. Azedarach. See Margosa.

Neer (adv. & a.) Nearer.

Ne'er (adv.) a contraction of Never.

Neesed (imp. & p. p.) of Neese

Neesing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Neese

Neese (v. i.) To sneeze.

Neesing (n.) Sneezing.

Ne exeat () A writ to restrain a person from leaving the country, or the jurisdiction of the court. The writ was originally applicable to purposes of state, but is now an ordinary process of courts of equity, resorted to for the purpose of obtaining bail, or security to abide a decree.

Nef (n.) The nave of a church.

Nefand (a.) Alt. of Nefandous

Nefandous (a.) Unfit to speak of; unmentionable; impious; execrable.

Nefarious (adv.) Wicked in the extreme; abominable; iniquitous; atrociously villainous; execrable; detestably vile.

Nefasch (n.) Any fish of the genus Distichodus. Several large species inhabit the Nile.

Nefast (a.) Wicked.

Negation (adv.) The act of denying; assertion of the nonreality or untruthfulness of anything; declaration that something is not, or has not been, or will not be; denial; -- the opposite of affirmation.

Negation (adv.) Description or definition by denial, exclusion, or exception; statement of what a thing is not, or has not, from which may be inferred what it is or has.

Negative (a.) Denying; implying, containing, or asserting denial, negation or refusal; returning the answer no to an inquiry or request; refusing assent; as, a negative answer; a negative opinion; -- opposed to affirmative.

Negative (a.) Not positive; without affirmative statement or demonstration; indirect; consisting in the absence of something; privative; as, a negative argument; a negative morality; negative criticism.

Negative (a.) Asserting absence of connection between a subject and a predicate; as, a negative proposition.

Negative (a.) Of or pertaining to a picture upon glass or other material, in which the lights and shades of the original, and the relations of right and left, are reversed.

Negative (a.) Metalloidal; nonmetallic; -- contracted with positive or basic; as, the nitro group is negative.

Negative (n.) A proposition by which something is denied or forbidden; a conception or term formed by prefixing the negative particle to one which is positive; an opposite or contradictory term or conception.

Negative (n.) A word used in denial or refusal; as, not, no.

Negative (n.) The refusal or withholding of assents; veto.

Negative (n.) That side of a question which denies or refuses, or which is taken by an opposing or denying party; the relation or position of denial or opposition; as, the question was decided in the negative.

Negative (n.) A picture upon glass or other material, in which the light portions of the original are represented in some opaque material (usually reduced silver), and the dark portions by the uncovered and transparent or semitransparent ground of the picture.

Negative (n.) The negative plate of a voltaic or electrolytic cell.

Negatived (imp. & p. p.) of Negative

Negativing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Negative

Negative (v. t.) To prove unreal or intrue; to disprove.

Negative (v. t.) To reject by vote; to refuse to enact or sanction; as, the Senate negatived the bill.

Negative (v. t.) To neutralize the force of; to counteract.

Negatively (adv.) In a negative manner; with or by denial.

Negatively (adv.) In the form of speech implying the absence of something; -- opposed to positively.

Negativeness (n.) Alt. of Negativity

Negativity (n.) The quality or state of being negative.

Negatory (a.) Expressing denial; belonging to negation; negative.

Neginoth (n. pl.) Stringed instruments.

Neglected (imp. & p. p.) of Neglect

Neglecting (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Neglect

Neglect (adv.) Not to attend to with due care or attention; to forbear one's duty in regard to; to suffer to pass unimproved, unheeded, undone, etc.; to omit; to disregard; to slight; as, to neglect duty or business; to neglect to pay debts.

Neglect (adv.) To omit to notice; to forbear to treat with attention or respect; to slight; as, to neglect strangers.

Neglect (v.) Omission of proper attention; avoidance or disregard of duty, from heedlessness, indifference, or willfulness; failure to do, use, or heed anything; culpable disregard; as, neglect of business, of health, of economy.

Neglect (v.) Omission if attention or civilities; slight; as, neglect of strangers.

Neglect (v.) Habitual carelessness; negligence.

Neglect (v.) The state of being disregarded, slighted, or neglected.

Neglectedness (n.) The state of being neglected.

Neglecter (n.) One who neglects.

Neglectful (a.) Full of neglect; heedless; careless; negligent; inattentive; indifferent.

Neglectingly (adv.) Carelessly; heedlessly.

Neglection (n.) The state of being negligent; negligence.

Neglective (a.) Neglectful.

Negligee (n.) An easy, unceremonious attire; undress; also, a kind of easy robe or dressing gown worn by women.

Negligence (n.) The quality or state of being negligent; lack of due diligence or care; omission of duty; habitual neglect; heedlessness.

Negligence (n.) An act or instance of negligence or carelessness.

Negligence (n.) The omission of the care usual under the circumstances, being convertible with the Roman culpa. A specialist is bound to higher skill and diligence in his specialty than one who is not a specialist, and liability for negligence varies acordingly.

Negligent (a.) Apt to neglect; customarily neglectful; characterized by negligence; careless; heedless; culpably careless; showing lack of attention; as, disposed in negligent order.

Negligently (adv.) In a negligent manner.

Negligible (a.) That may neglicted, disregarded, or left out of consideration.

Negoce (n.) Business; occupation.

Negotiability (n.) The quality of being negotiable or transferable by indorsement.

Negotiable (a.) Capable of being negotiated; transferable by assigment or indorsement to another person; as, a negotiable note or bill of exchange.

Negotiant (n.) A negotiator.

Negotiate (v. i.) To transact business; to carry on trade.

Negotiate (v. i.) To treat with another respecting purchase and sale or some business affair; to bargain or trade; as, to negotiate with a man for the purchase of goods or a farm.

Negotiate (v. i.) To hold intercourse respecting a treaty, league, or convention; to treat with, respecting peace or commerce; to conduct communications or conferences.

Negotiate (v. i.) To intrigue; to scheme.

Negotiated (imp. & p. p.) of Negotiate

Negotiating (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Negotiate

Negotiate (v. t.) To carry on negotiations concerning; to procure or arrange for by negotiation; as, to negotiate peace, or an exchange.

Negotiate (v. t.) To transfer for a valuable consideration under rules of commercial law; to sell; to pass.

Negotiation (n.) The act or process of negotiating; a treating with another respecting sale or purchase. etc.

Negotiation (n.) Hence, mercantile business; trading.

Negotiation (n.) The transaction of business between nations; the mutual intercourse of governments by diplomatic agents, in making treaties, composing difference, etc.; as, the negotiations at Ghent.

Negotiator (n.) One who negotiates; a person who treats with others, either as principal or agent, in respect to purchase and sale, or public compacts.

Negotiatory (a.) Of or pertaining to negotiation.

Negotiatrix (n.) A woman who negotiates.

Negotiosity (n.) The state of being busy; multitude of business.

Negotious (a.) Very busy; attentive to business; active.

Negotiousness (n.) The state of being busily occupied; activity.

Negresses (pl. ) of Negress

Negress (n.) A black woman; a female negro.

Negrita (n.) A blackish fish (Hypoplectrus nigricans), of the Sea-bass family. It is a native of the West Indies and Florida.

Negritic (a.) Of or pertaining to negroes; composed of negroes.

Negritos (n. pl.) A degraded Papuan race, inhabiting Luzon and some of the other east Indian Islands. They resemble negroes, but are smaller in size. They are mostly nomads.

Negroes (pl. ) of Negro

Negro (n.) A black man; especially, one of a race of black or very dark persons who inhabit the greater part of tropical Africa, and are distinguished by crisped or curly hair, flat noses, and thick protruding lips; also, any black person of unmixed African blood, wherever found.

Negro (a.) Of or pertaining to negroes; black.

Negroid (a.) Characteristic of the negro.

Negroid (a.) Resembling the negro or negroes; of or pertaining to those who resemble the negro.

Negroloid (a.) See Negroid.

Negus (n.) A beverage made of wine, water, sugar, nutmeg, and lemon juice; -- so called, it is said, from its first maker, Colonel Negus.

Nehiloth (n. pl.) A term supposed to mean, perforated wind instruments of music, as pipes or flutes.

Nehushtan (n.) A thing of brass; -- the name under which the Israelites worshiped the brazen serpent made by Moses.

Neif (n.) Alt. of Neife

Neife (n.) A woman born in the state of villeinage; a female serf.

Neif (n.) Alt. of Neaf

Neaf (n.) The fist.

Neighed (imp. & p. p.) of Neigh

Neighing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Neigh

Neigh (v. i.) To utter the cry of the horse; to whinny.

Neigh (v. i.) To scoff or sneer; to jeer.

Neigh (n.) The cry of a horse; a whinny.

Neighbor (n.) A person who lives near another; one whose abode is not far off.

Neighbor (n.) One who is near in sympathy or confidence.

Neighbor (n.) One entitled to, or exhibiting, neighborly kindness; hence, one of the human race; a fellow being.

Neighbor (a.) Near to another; adjoining; adjacent; next; neighboring.

Neighbored (imp. & p. p.) of neighbor

Neighboring (p. pr. & vb. n) of neighbor

neighbor (v. t.) To adjoin; to border on; tobe near to.

neighbor (v. t.) To associate intimately with.

Neighbor (v. i.) To dwell in the vicinity; to be a neighbor, or in the neighborhood; to be near.

Neighborhood (n.) The quality or condition of being a neighbor; the state of being or dwelling near; proximity.

Neighborhood (n.) A place near; vicinity; adjoining district; a region the inhabitants of which may be counted as neighbors; as, he lives in my neighborhood.

Neighborhood (n.) The inhabitants who live in the vicinity of each other; as, the fire alarmed all the neiborhood.

Neighborhood (n.) The disposition becoming a neighbor; neighborly kindness or good will.

Neighboring (a.) Living or being near; adjacent; as, the neighboring nations or countries.

Neighborliness (n.) The quality or state of being neighborly.

Neighborly (a.) Apropriate to the relation of neighbors; having frequent or familiar intercourse; kind; civil; social; friendly.

Neighborly (adv.) In a neigborly manner.

Neighborship (n.) The state of being neighbors.

Neishout (n.) The mahogany-like wood of the South African tree Pteroxylon utile, the sawdust of which causes violent sneezing (whence the name). Also called sneezewood.

Neither (a.) Not either; not the one or the other.

Neither (conj.) not either; generally used to introduce the first of two or more coordinate clauses of which those that follow begin with nor.

Nelumbo (n.) A genus of great water lilies. The North American species is Nelumbo lutea, the Asiatic is the sacred lotus, N. speciosa.

Nemaline (a.) Having the form of threads; fibrous.

Nemalite (n.) A fibrous variety of brucite.

Nematelmia (n. pl.) Same as Nemathelminthes.

Nemathecia (pl. ) of Nemathecium

Nemathecium (n.) A peculiar kind of fructification on certain red algae, consisting of an external mass of filaments at length separating into tetraspores.

Nemthelminthes (n. pl.) Alt. of Nematelminthes

Nematelminthes (n. pl.) An ordr of helminths, including the Nematoidea and Gordiacea; the roundworms.

Nemato- () A combining form from Gr. nh^ma, nh`matos, a thread.

Nematoblast (n.) A spermatocyte or spermoblast.

Nematocalyces (pl. ) of Nematocalyx

Calyxes (pl. ) of Nematocalyx

Nematocalyx (n.) One of a peculiar kind of cups, or calicles, found upon hydroids of the family Plumularidae. They contain nematocysts. See Plumularia.

Nematocera (n. pl.) A suborder of dipterous insects, having long antennae, as the mosquito, gnat, and crane fly; -- called also Nemocera.

Nematocyst (n.) A lasso cell, or thread cell. See Lasso cell, under Lasso.

Nematode (a. & n.) Same as Nematoid.

Nematogene (n.) One of the dimorphic forms of the species of Dicyemata, which produced vermiform embryos; -- opposed to rhombogene.

Nematognath (n.) one of the Nematognathi.

Nematognathi (n. pl.) An order of fishes having barbels on the jaws. It includes the catfishes, or siluroids. See Siluroid.

Nematoid (a.) Of or pertaining to the Nematoidea.

Nematoid (n.) One of the Nematoidea. see Illustration in Appendix.

Nematoidea (n. pl.) An order of worms, having a long, round, and generally smooth body; the roundworms. they are mostly parasites. Called also Nematodea, and Nematoda.

Nematoidean (a. & n.) Nematoid.

Nematophora (n. pl.) Same as Coelenterata.

Nemean (a.) Of or pertaining to Nemea, in Argolis, where the ancient Greeks celebrated games, and Hercules killed a lion.

Nemetean (a.) Of or pertaining to the Nemertina.

Nemetean (n.) One of the Nemertina.

Nemertes (n.) A genus of nemertina.

Nemertian (a. & n.) Nemertean.

Nemertid (a. & n.) Nemertean.

Nemertida (n. pl.) Nemertina.

Nemertina (n. pl.) An order of helminths usually having a long, slender, smooth, often bright-colored body, covered with minute vibrating cilia; -- called also Nemertea, Nemertida, and Rhynchocoela.

Nemesis (n.) The goddess of retribution or vengeance; hence, retributive justice personified; divine vengeance.

Nemophilist (n.) One who is fond of forest or forest scenery; a haunter of the woods.

Nemophily (n.) Fondness for forest scenery; love of the woods.

Nemoral (a.) Of or pertaining to a wood or grove.

Nemorous (a.) Woody.

Nempne (v.) To name or call.

Nempt (p. p.) Called; named.

Nems (n.) The ichneumon.

Nenia (n.) A funeral song; an elegy.

Nenuphar (n.) The great white water lily of Europe; the Nymphaea alba.

Neo- () A prefix meaning new, recent, late; and in chemistry designating specifically that variety of metameric hydrocarbons which, when the name was applied, had been recently classified, and in which at least one carbon atom in connected directly with four other carbon atoms; -- contrasted with normal and iso-; as, neopentane; the neoparaffins. Also used adjectively.

Neocarida (n. pl.) The modern, or true, Crustacea, as distinguished from the Merostomata.

Neocene (a.) More recent than the Eocene, that is, including both the Miocene and Pliocene divisions of the Tertiary.

Neo-Christianity (n.) Rationalism.

Neocomian (n.) A term applied to the lowest deposits of the Cretaceous or chalk formation of Europe, being the lower greensand.

Neocomian (a.) Of or pertaining to the lower greensand.

Neocosmic (a.) Of or pertaining to the universe in its present state; specifically, pertaining to the races of men known to history.

Neocracy (n.) Government by new or inexperienced hands; upstart rule; raw or untried officials.

Neodamode (n.) In ancient Sparta, one of those Helots who were freed by the state in reward for military service.

Neodymium (n.) An elementary substance which forms one of the constituents of didymium. Symbol Nd. Atomic weight 140.8.

Neogaean (a.) Of or pertaining to the New World, or Western Hemisphere.

Neogamist (n.) A person recently married.

Neogen (n.) An alloy resembling silver, and consisting chiefly of copper, zinc, and nickel, with small proportions of tin, aluminium, and bismuth.

Neography (n.) A new method or system of writing.

Neo-Latin (a.) Applied to the Romance languages, as being mostly of Latin origin.

Neolithic (a.) Of or pertaining to, or designating, an era characterized by late remains in stone.

Neologian (a.) Neologic; neological.

Neologian (n.) A neologist.

Neologianism (n.) Neologism.

Neologic (a.) Alt. of Neological

Neological (a.) Of or pertaining to neology; employing new words; of the nature of, or containing, new words or new doctrines.

Neologically (adv.) In a neological manner.

Neologism (n.) The introduction of new words, or the use of old words in a new sense.

Neologism (n.) A new word, phrase, or expression.

Neologism (n.) A new doctrine; specifically, rationalism.

Neologist (n.) One who introduces new words or new senses of old words into a language.

Neologist (n.) An innovator in any doctrine or system of belief, especially in theology; one who introduces or holds doctrines subversive of supernatural or revealed religion; a rationalist, so-called.

Neologistic (a.) Alt. of Neologistical

Neologistical (a.) Of or pertaining to neology; neological.

Neologization (n.) The act or process of neologizing.

Neologize (v. i.) To introduce or use new words or terms or new uses of old words.

Neologize (v. i.) To introduce innovations in doctrine, esp. in theological doctrine.

Neology (n.) The introduction of a new word, or of words or significations, into a language; as, the present nomenclature of chemistry is a remarkable instance of neology.

Neology (n.) A new doctrine; esp. (Theol.), a doctrine at variance with the received interpretation of revealed truth; a new method of theological interpretation; rationalism.

Neomenia (n.) The time of the new moon; the beginning of the month in the lunar calendar.

Neomenoidea (n. pl.) A division of vermiform gastropod mollusks, without a shell, belonging to the Isopleura.

Neomorph (n.) A structure, part, or organ developed independently, that is, not derived from a similar structure, part, or organ, in a pre existing form.

Neonism (n.) Neologism.

Neonomian (n.) One who advocates adheres to new laws; esp. one who holds or believes that the gospel is a new law.

Neonomian (a.) Of or pertaining to the Neonomians, or in accordance with their doctrines.

Neonomianism (n.) The doctrines or belief of the neonomians.

Neophyte (n.) A new convert or proselyte; -- a name given by the early Christians, and still given by the Roman Catholics, to such as have recently embraced the Christian faith, and been admitted to baptism, esp. to converts from heathenism or Judaism.

Neophyte (n.) A novice; a tyro; a beginner in anything.

Neoplasia (n.) Growth or development of new material; neoplasty.

Neoplasm (n.) A new formation or tissue, the product of morbid action.

Neoplastic (a.) Of or pertaining to neoplasty, or neoplasia.

Neoplasty (n.) Restoration of a part by granulation, adhesive inflammation, or autoplasty.

Neoplatonic (a.) Of, pertaining to, or resembling, Neoplatonism or the Neoplatonists.

Neoplatonician (n.) A neoplatonist.

Neoplatonism (n.) A pantheistic eclectic school of philosophy, of which Plotinus was the chief (A. D. 205-270), and which sought to reconcile the Platonic and Aristotelian systems with Oriental theosophy. It tended to mysticism and theurgy, and was the last product of Greek philosophy.

Neoplatonist (n.) One who held to Neoplatonism; a member of the Neoplatonic school.

Neorama (n.) A panorama of the interior of a building, seen from within.

Neossine (n.) The substance constituting the edible bird's nest.

Neossology (n.) The study of young birds.

Neoteric (a.) Alt. of Neoterical

Neoterical (a.) Recent in origin; modern; new.

Neoteric (n.) One of modern times; a modern.

Neoterically (adv.) Recently; newly.

Neoterism (n.) An innovation or novelty; a neoteric word or phrase.

Neoterist (n.) One ho introduces new word/ or phrases.

Neoterized (imp. & p. p.) of Neoterize

Neoterized (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Neoterize

Neoterize (v. i.) To innovate; to coin or introduce new words.

Neotropical (a.) Belonging to, or designating, a region of the earth's surface which comprises most of South America, the Antilles, and tropical North America.

Neozoic (a.) More recent than the Paleozoic, -- that is, including the Mesozoic and Cenozoic.

Nep (n.) Catnip.

Nepa (n.) A genus of aquatic hemipterus insects. The species feed upon other insects and are noted for their voracity; -- called also scorpion bug and water scorpion.

Nepaulese (a.) Of or pertaining to Nepaul, a kingdom in Northern Hindostan.

Nepaulese (n. sing. & pl.) A native or natives of Nepaul.

Nepenthe (n.) A drug used by the ancients to give relief from pain and sorrow; -- by some supposed to have been opium or hasheesh. Hence, anything soothing and comforting.

Nepenthes (n.) Same as Nepenthe.

Nepenthes (n.) A genus of climbing plants found in India, Malaya, etc., which have the leaves prolonged into a kind of stout tendril terminating in a pitcherlike appendage, whence the plants are often called pitcher plants and monkey-cups. There are about thirty species, of which the best known is Nepenthes distillatoria. See Pitcher plant.

Nepeta (n.) A genus of labiate plants, including the catnip and ground ivy.

Nephalism (n.) Total abstinence from spirituous liquor.

Nephalist (n.) One who advocates or practices nephalism.

Nepheline (n.) Alt. of Nephelite

Nephelite (n.) A mineral occuring at Vesuvius, in glassy agonal crystals; also elsewhere, in grayish or greenish masses having a greasy luster, as the variety elaeolite. It is a silicate of aluminia, soda, and potash.

Nephelodometer (n.) An instrument for reckoning the distances or velocities of clouds.

Nephelometer (n.) An instrument for measuring or registering the amount of cloudiness.

Nephew (n.) A grandson or grandchild, or remoter lineal descendant.

Nephew (n.) A cousin.

Nephew (n.) The son of a brother or a sister, or of a brother-in-law or sister-in-law.

Nephilim (n. pl.) Giants.

Nephoscope (n.) An instrument for observing the clouds and their velocity.

Nephralgia (n.) Alt. of Nephralgy

Nephralgy (n.) Neuralgia of the kidneys; a disease characterized by pain in the region of the kidneys without any structural lesion of the latter.

Nephridial (a.) Of or pertaining to a nephridium.

Nephridia (pl. ) of Nephridium

Nephridium (n.) A segmental tubule; one of the tubules of the primitive urinogenital organs; a segmental organ. See Illust. under Loeven's larva.

Nephrite (n.) A hard compact mineral, of a dark green color, formerly worn as a remedy for diseases of the kidneys, whence its name; kidney stone; a kind of jade. See Jade.

Nephritic (a.) Alt. of Nephritical

Nephritical (a.) Of or pertaining to the kidneys or urinary organs; renal; as, a nephritic disease.

Nephritical (a.) Affected with a disease of the kidneys; as, a nephritic patient.

Nephritical (a.) Relieving disorders of the kidneys; affecting the kidneys; as, a nephritic medicine.

Nephritic (n.) A medicine adapted to relieve or cure disease of the kidneys.

Nephritis (n.) An inflammation of the kidneys.

nephrolithic (a.) Of or pertaining to gravel, or renal calculi.

Nephrology (n.) A treatise on, or the science which treats of, the kidneys, and their structure and functions.

Nephrostome (n.) The funnelshaped opening of a nephridium into the body cavity.

Nephrotomy (n.) Extraction of stone from the kidney by cutting.

Nepotal (a.) Of or relating to a nephew.

Nepotic (a.) Of or pertaining to npotism.

Nepotism (n.) Undue attachment to relations; favoritism shown to members of one's family; bestowal of patronage in consideration of relationship, rather than of merit or of legal claim.

Nepotist (n.) One who practices nepotism.

Neptune (n.) The son of Saturn and Ops, the god of the waters, especially of the sea. He is represented as bearing a trident for a scepter.

Neptune (n.) The remotest known planet of our system, discovered -- as a result of the computations of Leverrier, of Paris -- by Galle, of Berlin, September 23, 1846. Its mean distance from the sun is about 2,775,000,000 miles, and its period of revolution is about 164,78 years.

Neptunian (a.) Of or pertaining to the ocean or sea.

Neptunian (a.) Formed by water or aqueous solution; as, Neptunian rocks.

Neptunian (n.) Alt. of Neptunist

Neptunist (n.) One who adopts the neptunian theory.

Neptunicentric (a.) As seen from Neptune, or having Neptune as a center; as, Neptunicentric longitude or force.

Neptunium (n.) A new metallic element, of doubtful genuineness and uncertain indentification, said to exist in certain minerals, as columbite.

Ner (adv. & a.) nearer.

Nere () Were not.

Nereids (pl. ) of Nereid

Nereides (pl. ) of Nereid

Nereid (n.) A sea nymph, one of the daughters of Nereus, who were attendants upon Neptune, and were represented as riding on sea horses, sometimes with the human form entire, and sometimes with the tail of a fish.

Nereid (n.) Any species of Nereis. The word is sometimes used for similar annelids of other families.

Nereidian (n.) Any annelid resembling Nereis, or of the family Lycoridae or allied families.

Nereides (pl. ) of Nereis

Nereis (n.) A Nereid. See Nereid.

Nereis (n.) A genus, including numerous species, of marine chaetopod annelids, having a well-formed head, with two pairs of eyes, antennae, four pairs of tentacles, and a protrusile pharynx, armed with a pair of hooked jaws.

Nereites (n. pl.) Fossil tracks of annelids.

Nereocystis (n.) A genus of gigantic seaweeds.

Nerfling (n.) The id.

Nerita (n.) A genus of marine gastropods, mostly natives of warm climates.

Nerite (n.) Any mollusk of the genus Nerita.

Neritina (n.) A genus including numerous species of shells resembling Nerita in form. They mostly inhabit brackish water, and are often delicately tinted.

Nero (n.) A Roman emperor notorius for debauchery and barbarous cruelty; hence, any profligate and cruel ruler or merciless tyrant.

Neroli (n.) An essential oil obtained by distillation from the flowers of the orange. It has a strong odor, and is used in perfumery, etc.

Nerre (adv. & a.) Nearer.

Nervate (a.) Nerved.

Nervation (n.) The arrangement of nerves and veins, especially those of leaves; neuration.

Nerve (n.) One of the whitish and elastic bundles of fibers, with the accompanying tissues, which transmit nervous impulses between nerve centers and various parts of the animal body.

Nerve (n.) A sinew or a tendon.

Nerve (n.) Physical force or steadiness; muscular power and control; constitutional vigor.

Nerve (n.) Steadiness and firmness of mind; self-command in personal danger, or under suffering; unshaken courage and endurance; coolness; pluck; resolution.

Nerve (n.) Audacity; assurance.

Nerve (n.) One of the principal fibrovascular bundles or ribs of a leaf, especially when these extend straight from the base or the midrib of the leaf.

Nerve (n.) One of the nervures, or veins, in the wings of insects.

Nerved (imp. & p. p.) of Nerve

Nerving (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Nerve

Nerve (v. t.) To give strength or vigor to; to supply with force; as, fear nerved his arm.

Nerved (a.) Having nerves of a special character; as, weak-nerved.

Nerved (a.) Having nerves, or simple and parallel ribs or veins.

Nerveless (a.) Destitute of nerves.

Nerveless (a.) Destitute of strength or of courage; wanting vigor; weak; powerless.

Nervelessness (n.) The state of being nerveless.

Nerve-shaken (a.) Affected by a tremor, or by a nervous disease; weakened; overcome by some violent influence or sensation; shoked.

Nervimotion (n.) The movement caused in the sensory organs by external agents and transmitted to the muscles by the nerves.

Nervimotor (n.) Any agent capable of causing nervimotion.

Nervine (a.) Having the quality of acting upon or affecting the nerves; quieting nervous excitement.

Nervine (n.) A nervine agent.

Nervomuscular (a.) Of or pertaining to both nerves and muscles; of the nature of nerves and muscles; as, nervomuscular energy.

Nervose (a.) Same as Nerved.

Nervosity (n.) Nervousness.

Nervous (a.) possessing nerve; sinewy; strong; vigorous.

Nervous (a.) Possessing or manifesting vigor of mind; characterized by strength in sentiment or style; forcible; spirited; as, a nervous writer.

Nervous (a.) Of or pertaining to the nerves; seated in the nerves; as, nervous excitement; a nervous fever.

Nervous (a.) Having the nerves weak, diseased, or easily excited; subject to, or suffering from, undue excitement of the nerves; easily agitated or annoyed.

Nervous (a.) Sensitive; excitable; timid.

Nervously (adv.) In a nervous manner.

Nervousness (n.) State or quality of being nervous.

Nervure (n.) One of the nerves of leaves.

Nervure (n.) One of the chitinous supports, or veins, in the wings of incests.

Nervy (superl. -) Strong; sinewy.

Nescience (n.) Want of knowledge; ignorance; agnosticism.

Nese (n.) Nose.

Nesh (a.) Soft; tender; delicate.

Ness (n.) A promontory; a cape; a headland.

-ness () A suffix used to form abstract nouns expressive of quality or state; as, goodness, greatness.

Nesslerize (v. t.) To treat or test, as a liquid, with a solution of mercuric iodide in potassium iodide and potassium hydroxide, which is called Nessler's solution or Nessler's test, and is used to detect the presence of ammonia.

Nest (n.) The bed or receptacle prepared by a fowl for holding her eggs and for hatching and rearing her young.

Nest (n.) Hence: the place in which the eggs of other animals, as insects, turtles, etc., are laid and hatched; a snug place in which young animals are reared.

Nest (n.) A snug, comfortable, or cozy residence or situation; a retreat, or place of habitual resort; hence, those who occupy a nest, frequent a haunt, or are associated in the same pursuit; as, a nest of traitors; a nest of bugs.

Nest (n.) An aggregated mass of any ore or mineral, in an isolated state, within a rock.

Nest (n.) A collection of boxes, cases, or the like, of graduated size, each put within the one next larger.

Nest (n.) A compact group of pulleys, gears, springs, etc., working together or collectively.

Nest (v. i.) To build and occupy a nest.

Nest (v. t.) To put into a nest; to form a nest for.

Nestfuls (pl. ) of Nestful

Nestful (n.) As much or many as will fill a nest.

Nestled (imp. & p. p.) of Nestle

Nestling (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Nestle

Nestle (v. i.) To make and occupy a nest; to nest.

Nestle (v. i.) To lie close and snug, as a bird in her nest; to cuddle up; to settle, as in a nest; to harbor; to take shelter.

Nestle (v. i.) To move about in one's place, like a bird when shaping the interior of her nest or a young bird getting close to the parent; as, a child nestles.

Nestle (v. t.) To house, as in a nest.

Nestle (v. t.) To cherish, as a bird her young.

Nestling (n.) A young bird which has not abandoned the nest.

Nestling (n.) A nest; a receptacle.

Nestling (a.) Newly hatched; being yet in the nest.

Nestor (n.) A genus of parrots with gray heads. of New Zeland and papua, allied to the cockatoos. See Kaka.

Nestorian (n.) An adherent of Nestorius, patriarch of Constantinople to the fifth century, who has condemned as a heretic for maintaining that the divine and the human natures were not merged into one nature in Christ (who was God in man), and, hence, that it was improper to call Mary the mother of Christ; also, one of the sect established by the followers of Nestorius in Persia, india, and other Oriental countries, and still in existence. opposed to Eutychian.

Nestorian (a.) Of or relating to the Nestorians.

Nestorian (a.) relating to, or resembling, Nestor, the aged warior and counselor mentioned by Homer; hence, wise; experienced; aged; as, Nestorian caution.

Nestorianism (n.) The doctrines of the nestorian Christians, or of Nestorius.

Ney (n.) A fabric of twine, thread, or the like, wrought or woven into meshes, and used for catching fish, birds, butterflies, etc.

Ney (n.) Anything designed or fitted to entrap or catch; a snare; any device for catching and holding.

Ney (n.) Anything wrought or woven in meshes; as, a net for the hair; a mosquito net; a tennis net.

Ney (n.) A figure made up of a large number of straight lines or curves, which are connected at certain points and related to each other by some specified law.

Netted (imp. & p. p.) of Net

Netting (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Net

Net (v. t.) To make into a net; to make n the style of network; as, to net silk.

Net (v. t.) To take in a net; to capture by stratagem or wile.

Net (v. t.) To inclose or cover with a net; as, to net a tree.

Net (v. i.) To form network or netting; to knit.

Net (a.) Without spot; pure; shining.

Net (a.) Free from extraneous substances; pure; unadulterated; neat; as, net wine, etc.

Net (a.) Not including superfluous, incidental, or foreign matter, as boxes, coverings, wraps, etc.; free from charges, deductions, etc; as, net profit; net income; net weight, etc.

Netted (imp. & p. p.) of Net

Netting (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Net

Net (v. t.) To produce or gain as clear profit; as, he netted a thousand dollars by the operation.

Netfish (n.) An astrophyton.

Nether (a.) Situated down or below; lying beneath, or in the lower part; having a lower position; belonging to the region below; lower; under; -- opposed to upper.

Neithermore (a.) Lower, nether.

Nethermost (a.) Lowest; as, the nethermost abyss.

Nethinim (n. pl.) Servants of the priests and Levites in the menial services about the tabernacle and temple.

Netify (v. t.) To render neat; to clean; to put in order.

Netting (n.) The act or process of making nets or network, or of forming meshes, as for fancywork, fishing nets, etc.

Netting (n.) A piece of network; any fabric, made of cords, threads, wires, or the like, crossing one another with open spaces between.

Netting (n.) A network of ropes used for various purposes, as for holding the hammocks when not in use, also for stowing sails, and for hoisting from the gunwale to the rigging to hinder an enemy from boarding.

Netting (n.) Urine.

Nettle (n.) A plant of the genus Urtica, covered with minute sharp hairs containing a poison that produces a stinging sensation. Urtica gracitis is common in the Northern, and U. chamaedryoides in the Southern, United States. the common European species, U. urens and U. dioica, are also found in the Eastern united States. U. pilulifera is the Roman nettle of England.

Nettled (imp. & p. p.) of Nettle

Nettling (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Nettle

Nettle (v. t.) To fret or sting; to irritate or vex; to cause to experience sensations of displeasure or uneasiness not amounting to violent anger.

Nettlebird (n.) the European whitethroat.

Nettler (n.) One who nettles.

Nettles (n. pl.) The halves of yarns in the unlaid end of a rope twisted for pointing or grafting.

Nettles (n. pl.) Small lines used to sling hammocks under the deck beams.

Nettles (n. pl.) Reef points.

Nettling (n.) A process (resembling splicing) by which two ropes are jointed end so as to form one rope.

Nettling (n.) The process of tying together the ends of yarns in pairs, to prevent tangling.

Nettling (p. pr. & a.) Stinging; irritating.

Netty (a.) Like a net, or network; netted.

Net-veined (a.) Having veins, or nerves, reticulated or netted; as, a net-veined wing or leaf.

Network (n.) A fabric of threads, cords, or wires crossing each other at certain intervals, and knotted or secured at the crossings, thus leaving spaces or meshes between them.

Network (n.) Any system of lines or channels interlacing or crossing like the fabric of a net; as, a network of veins; a network of railroads.

Neurad (adv.) Toward the neural side; -- opposed to haemad.

Neural (a.) relating to the nerves or nervous system; taining to, situated in the region of, or on the side with, the neural, or cerebro-spinal, axis; -- opposed to hemal. As applied to vertebrates, neural is the same as dorsal; as applied to invertebrates it is usually the same as ventral. Cf. Hemal.

Neuralgia (n.) A disease, the chief symptom of which is a very acute pain, exacerbating or intermitting, which follows the course of a nervous branch, extends to its ramifications, and seems therefore to be seated in the nerve. It seems to be independent of any structural lesion.

Neuralgic (a.) Of or pertaining to, or having the character of, neuralgia; as, a neuralgic headache.

Neuralgy (n.) Neuralgia.

Neurapophysial (a.) Of or pertaining to a neurapophysis.

Neurapophyses (pl. ) of Neurapophysis

Neurapophysis (n.) One of the two lateral processes or elements which form the neural arch.

Neurapophysis (n.) The dorsal process of the neural arch; neural spine; spinous process.

Neurasthenia (n.) A condition of nervous debility supposed to be dependent upon impairment in the functions of the spinal cord.

Neuration (n.) The arrangement or distribution of nerves, as in the leaves of a plant or the wings of an insect; nervation.

Neuraxis (n.) See Axis cylinder, under Axis.

Neurenteric (a.) Of or pertaining to both the neuron and the enteron; as, the neurenteric canal, which, in embroys of many vertebrates, connects the medullary tube and the primitive intestine. See Illust. of Ectoderm.

Neuridin (n.) a nontoxic base, C5H14N2, found in the putrescent matters of flesh, fish, decaying cheese, etc.

Neurilemma (n.) The delicate outer sheath of a nerve fiber; the primitive sheath.

Neurilemma (n.) The perineurium.

Neurility (n.) The special properties and functions of the nerves; that capacity for transmitting a stimulus which belongs to nerves.

Neurine (n.) A poisonous organic base (a ptomaine) formed in the decomposition of protagon with boiling baryta water, and in the putrefraction of proteid matter. It was for a long time considered identical with choline, a crystalline body originally obtained from bile. Chemically, however, choline is oxyethyl-trimethyl-ammonium hydroxide, while neurine is vinyl-trimethyl-ammonium hydroxide.

Neurism (n.) Nerve force. See Vital force, under Vital.

Neuritis (n.) Inflammation of a nerve.

Neuro- () A combining denoting a nerve, of / pertaining to a nerve / the nervous system.

Neuro-central (a.) Between the neural arch and the centrum of a vertebra; as, the neurocentral suture.

Neurochord (a.) Alt. of Neurochordal

Neurochordal (a.) See Neurocord.

Neurocity (n.) Nerve force.

Neurocoele (n.) The central canal and ventricles of the spinal cord and brain; the myelencephalic cavity.

Neurocord (n.) A cordlike organ composed of elastic fibers situated above the ventral nervous cord of annelids, like the earthworm.

Neuro-epidermal (a.) Pertaining to, or giving rise to, the central nervous system and epiderms; as, the neuroepidermal, or epiblastic, layer of the blastoderm.

Neuroglia (n.) The delicate connective tissue framework which supports the nervous matter and blood vessels of the brain and spinal cord.

Neurography (n.) A description of the nerves.

Neurokeratin (n.) A substance, resembling keratin, present in nerve tissue, as in the sheath of the axis cylinder of medullated nerve fibers. Like keratin it resists the action of most chemical agents, and by decomposition with sulphuric acid yields leucin and tyrosin.

Neurological (a.) Of or pertaining to neurolgy.

Neurologist (n.) One who is versed in neurology; also, one skilled in the treatment of nervous diseases.

Neurology (n.) The branch of science which treats of the nervous system.

Neuroma (n.) A tumor developed on, or connected with, a nerve, esp. one consisting of new-formed nerve fibers.

Neuromere (n.) A metameric segment of the cerebro-spinal nervous system.

Neuromuscular (a.) Nervomuscular.

Neura (pl. ) of Neuron

Neuron (n.) The brain and spinal cord; the cerebro-spinal axis; myelencephalon.

Neuropathic (a.) Of or pertaining to neuropathy; of the nature of, or suffering from, nervous disease.

Neuropathy (n.) An affection of the nervous system or of a nerve.

Neuropod (n.) A neuropodous animal.

Neuropodium (n.) The ventral lobe or branch of a parapodium.

Neuropodous (a.) Having the limbs on, or directed toward, the neural side, as in most invertebrates; -- opposed to haemapodous.

Neuropore (n.) An opening at either end of the embryonic neural canal.

Neuropter (n.) One of the Neuroptera.

Neuroptera (n. pl.) An order of hexapod insects having two pairs of large, membranous, net-veined wings. The mouth organs are adapted for chewing. They feed upon other insects, and undergo a complete metamorphosis. The ant-lion, hellgamite, and lacewing fly are examples. Formerly, the name was given to a much more extensive group, including the true Neuroptera and the Pseudoneuroptera.

Neropteral (a.) Of or pertaining to the Neuroptera.

Neuropteran (n.) A neuropter.

Neuropteris (n.) An extensive genus of fossil ferns, of which species have been found from the Devonian to the Triassic formation.

Neuropterous (a.) Neuropteral.

Neurosensiferous (a.) Pertaining to, or forming, both nerves and sense organs.

Neurosis (n.) A functional nervous affection or disease, that is, a disease of the nerves without any appreciable change of nerve structure.

Neuroskeletal (a.) Of or pertaining to the neuroskeleton.

Neuroskeleton (n.) The deep-seated parts of the vertebrate skeleton which are relation with the nervous axis and locomation.

Neurospast (n.) A puppet.

Neurotic (a.) Of or pertaining to the nerves; seated in the nerves; nervous; as, a neurotic disease.

Neurotic (a.) Uself in disorders of, or affecting, the nerves.

Neurotic (n.) A disease seated in the nerves.

Neurotic (n.) Any toxic agent whose action is mainly directed to the great nerve centers.

Neurotome (n.) An instrument for cutting or dissecting nerves.

Neurotome (n.) A neuromere.

Neurotomical (a.) Of or pertaining to neurotomy.

Neurotomist (n.) One who skilled in or practices neurotomy.

Neurotomy (n.) The dissection, or anatomy, of the nervous system.

Neurotomy (n.) The division of a nerve, for the relief of neuralgia, or for other purposes.

Neurula (n.) An embryo or certain invertebrates in the stage when the primitive band is first developed.

Neuter (a.) Neither the one thing nor the other; on neither side; impartial; neutral.

Neuter (a.) Having a form belonging more especially to words which are not appellations of males or females; expressing or designating that which is of neither sex; as, a neuter noun; a neuter termination; the neuter gender.

Neuter (a.) Intransitive; as, a neuter verb.

Neuter (a.) Having no generative organs, or imperfectly developed ones; sexless. See Neuter, n., 3.

Neuter (n.) A person who takes no part in a contest; one who is either indifferent to a cause or forbears to interfere; a neutral.

Neuter (n.) A noun of the neuter gender; any one of those words which have the terminations usually found in neuter words.

Neuter (n.) An intransitive verb.

Neuter (n.) An organism, either vegetable or animal, which at its maturity has no generative organs, or but imperfectly developed ones, as a plant without stamens or pistils, as the garden Hydrangea; esp., one of the imperfectly developed females of certain social insects, as of the ant and the common honeybee, which perform the labors of the community, and are called workers.

Neutral (a.) Not engaged on either side; not taking part with or assisting either of two or more contending parties; neuter; indifferent.

Neutral (a.) Neither good nor bad; of medium quality; middling; not decided or pronounced.

Neutral (a.) Neuter. See Neuter, a., 3.

Neutral (a.) Having neither acid nor basic properties; unable to turn red litmus blue or blue litmus red; -- said of certain salts or other compounds. Contrasted with acid, and alkaline.

Neutral (n.) A person or a nation that takes no part in a contest between others; one who is neutral.

Neutralist (n.) A neutral; one who professes or practices neutrality.

Neutrality (n.) The state or quality of being neutral; the condition of being unengaged in contests between others; state of taking no part on either side; indifference.

Neutrality (n.) Indifference in quality; a state neither very good nor bad.

Neutrality (n.) The quality or state of being neutral. See Neutral, a., 4.

Neutrality (a.) The condition of a nation or government which refrains from taking part, directly or indirectly, in a war between other powers.

Neutrality (a.) Those who are neutral; a combination of neutral powers or states.

Neutralization (n.) The act or process of neutralizing, or the state of being neutralized.

Neutralization (n.) The act or process by which an acid and a base are combined in such proportions that the resulting compound is neutral. See Neutral, a., 4.

Neutralized (imp. & p. p.) of Neutralize

Neutralizing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Neutralize

Neutralize (v. t.) To render neutral; to reduce to a state of neutrality.

Neutralize (v. t.) To render inert or imperceptible the peculiar affinities of, as a chemical substance; to destroy the effect of; as, to neutralize an acid with a base.

Neutralize (v. t.) To destroy the peculiar or opposite dispositions of; to reduce to a state of indifference inefficience; to counteract; as, to neutralize parties in government; to neutralize efforts, opposition, etc.

Neutralizer (n.) One who, or that which, neutralizes; that which destroys, disguises, or renders inert the peculiar properties of a body.

Neutrally (adv.) In a neutral manner; without taking part with either side; indifferently.

Neuvaines (n. pl.) Prayers offered up for nine successive days.

Nevadite (n.) A grantitoid variety of rhyolite, common in Nevada.

Neve (n.) The upper part of a glacier, above the limit or perpetual snow. See Galcier.

Neven (v. t.) To name; to mention; to utter.

Never (adv.) Not ever; not at any time; at no time, whether past, present, or future.

Never (adv.) In no degree; not in the least; not.

Nevermore (adv.) Never again; at no time hereafter.

Neverthelater (adv. / conj.) Nevertheless.

Nevertheless (adv. / conj.) Not the less; notwithstanding; in spite of that; yet.

Nevew (n.) Nephew.

New (superl.) Having existed, or having been made, but a short time; having originated or occured lately; having recently come into existence, or into one's possession; not early or long in being; of late origin; recent; fresh; modern; -- opposed to old, as, a new coat; a new house; a new book; a new fashion.

New (superl.) Not before seen or known, although existing before; lately manifested; recently discovered; as, a new metal; a new planet; new scenes.

New (superl.) Newly beginning or recurring; starting anew; now commencing; different from has been; as, a new year; a new course or direction.

New (superl.) As if lately begun or made; having the state or quality of original freshness; also, changed for the better; renovated; unworn; untried; unspent; as, rest and travel made him a new man.

New (superl.) Not of ancient extraction, or of a family of ancient descent; not previously kniwn or famous.

New (superl.) Not habituated; not familiar; unaccustomed.

New (superl.) Fresh from anything; newly come.

New (adv.) Newly; recently.

New (v. t. & i.) To make new; to renew.

Newborn (a.) Recently born.

Newcome (a.) Recently come.

Newcomer (n.) One who has lately come.

Newel (n.) A novelty; a new thing.

Newel (n.) The upright post about which the steps of a circular staircase wind; hence, in stairs having straight flights, the principal post at the foot of a staircase, or the secondary ones at the landings. See Hollow newel, under Hollow.

Newfangle (a.) Eager for novelties; desirous of changing.

Newfangle (v. t.) To change by introducing novelties.

Newfangled (a.) Newmade; formed with the affectation of novelty.

Newfangled (a.) Disposed to change; inclined to novelties; given to new theories or fashions.

Newfangledness (n.) Affectation of, or fondness for, novelty; vain or affected fashion or form.

Newfangleness (n.) Newfangledness.

Newfanglist (n.) One who is eager for novelties or desirous of change.

Newfangly (adv.) In a newfangled manner; with eagerness for novelty.

Newfashioned (a.) Made in a new form, or lately come into fashion.

Newfoundland (n.) An island on the coast of British North America, famed for the fishing grounds in its vicinity.

Newfoundland (n.) A Newfoundland dog.

Newing (v. t.) Yeast; barm.

Newish (a.) Somewhat new; nearly new.

Newly (adv.) Lately; recently.

Newly (adv.) Anew; afresh; freshly.

Newmarket (n.) A long, closely fitting cloak.

New-model (v. t.) To remodel.

Newness (n.) The quality or state of being new; as, the newness of a system; the newness of a scene; newness of life.

News (n) A report of recent occurences; information of something that has lately taken place, or of something before unknown; fresh tindings; recent intelligence.

News (n) Something strange or newly happened.

News (n) A bearer of news; a courier; a newspaper.

News-book (n.) A newspaper.

newsboy (n.) A boy who distributes or sells newspaper.

News-letter (n.) A circular letter, written or printed for the purpose of disseminating news. This was the name given to the earliest English newspapers.

Newsmen (pl. ) of Newsman

Newsman (n.) One who brings news.

Newsman (n.) A man who distributes or sells newspapers.

Newsmonger (n.) One who deals in news; one who is active in hearing and telling news.

Newspaper (n.) A sheet of paper printed and distributed, at stated intervals, for conveying intelligence of passing events, advocating opinions, etc.; a public print that circulates news, advertisements, proceedings of legislative bodies, public announcements, etc.

Newsroom (n.) A room where news is collected and disseminated, or periodicals sold; a reading room supplied with newspapers, magazines, etc.

News-vnder (n.) A seller of newspapers.

News-writer (n.) One who gathered news for, and wrote, news-letters.

Newsy (a.) Full of news; abounding in information as to current events.

Newt (n.) Any one of several species of small aquatic salamanders. The common British species are the crested newt (Triton cristatus) and the smooth newt (Lophinus punctatus). In America, Diemictylus viridescens is one of the most abundant species.

Newtonian (a.) Of or pertaining to Sir Isaac Newton, or his discoveries.

Newtonian (n.) A follower of Newton.

New-year (a.) Of or pertaining to, or suitable for, the commencement of the year; as, New-year gifts or odes.

New Year's Day () the first day of a calendar year; the first day of January. Often colloquially abbreviated to New year's or new year.

New Zealand () A group of islands in the South Pacific Ocean.

Nexible (a.) That may be knit together.

Next (superl.) Nearest in place; having no similar object intervening.

Next (superl.) Nearest in time; as, the next day or hour.

Next (superl.) Adjoining in a series; immediately preceding or following in order.

Next (superl.) Nearest in degree, quality, rank, right, or relation; as, the next heir was an infant.

Next (adv.) In the time, place, or order nearest or immediately suceeding; as, this man follows next.

Nexus (n.) Connection; tie.

Nez Perces () A tribe of Indians, mostly inhabiting Idaho.

Ngina (n.) The gorilla.

Niagara period () A subdivision or the American Upper Silurian system, embracing the Medina, Clinton, and Niagara epoch. The rocks of the Niagara epoch, mostly limestones, are extensively distributed, and at Niagara Falls consist of about eighty feet of shale supporting a greater thickness of limestone, which is gradually undermined by the removal of the shale. See Chart of Geology.

Nias (n.) A young hawk; an eyas; hence, an unsophisticated person.

Nib (n.) A small and pointed thing or part; a point; a prong.

Nib (n.) The bill or beak of a bird; the neb.

Nib (n.) The points of a pen; also, the pointed part of a pen; a short pen adapted for insertion in a holder.

Nib (n.) One of the handles which project from a scythe snath; also, [Prov. Eng.], the shaft of a wagon.

Nebbed (imp. & p. p.) of Nib

Nibbing (p. pr. & vb. n.) of Nib

Nib (v. t.) To furnish with a nib; to point; to mend the point of; as, to nib a pen.

Nibbed (a.) Having a nib or point.